Arkansas, session 2025, HB1512.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas ACCESS Act”.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-1-404(a), concerning the membership of
the School Leadership Coordinating Council, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The School Leadership Coordinating Council consists of seventeen
(17) the following members as follows:
(1) The Chair of the Arkansas Association of Colleges for
Teacher Education Council of Deans;
(2) The Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education;
(3) The Director of the Arkansas Leadership Academy;
(4)(2) The Commissioner of the Division of Higher Education;
*CRH113*
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(5)(3) The Director of the Division of Career and Technical
Education;
(6) The Executive Director of the Arkansas Association of
Educational Administrators;
(7) The Executive Director of the Arkansas Education
Association;
(8) The Executive Director of the Arkansas School Boards
Association;
(9) The Executive Director of the Arkansas Association for
Supervision and Curriculum Development;
(10) The Executive Director of the Arkansas Rural Ed
Association;
(11) A representative from the Arkansas Professors of
Educational Administration;
(12) A representative from the Arkansas Center for Executive
Leadership;
(13) A representative from an education service cooperative;
(14) A representative from the Arkansas Public School Resource
Center, Inc.;
(15) A representative from the Arkansas State Teachers
Association;
(16)(4) The Chair of the Senate Committee on Education or the
chair's designee; and
(17)(5) The Chair of the House Committee on Education or the
chair's designee; and
(6) Other stakeholders as deemed necessary by the members
designated under subdivisions (a)(1)-(5) of this section.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-1-404(d), concerning meetings of the
School Leadership Coordinating Council, is amended to read as follows:
(d)(1) The council shall meet at the times and places that the Chair
of the School Leadership Coordinating Council deems necessary but no less
than four (4) times per year.
(2) Seven (7) A majority of the members of the council shall
constitute a quorum for the purpose of transacting business.
(3) All actions of the council are by quorum.
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 5, Subchapter 11 is
repealed.
Subchapter 11 — Council on Postsecondary Education and Career Readiness
6-5-1101. Legislative intent.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Public schools should help all students:
(A) Have the reading, writing, and mathematics skills
needed to succeed in all first-year coursework in associate and baccalaureate
degree programs in non-mathematics-based majors; and
(B) Be ready for as many career options as possible by
having a base level of employability; and
(2) The development of college and career readiness standards
should be undertaken as an integrative process among:
(A) The General Assembly;
(B) State agencies that regulate and support the public
educational systems of the state;
(C) Kindergarten, elementary, secondary, and postsecondary
educational institutions; and
(D) The public.

6-5-1102. Council on Postsecondary Education and Career Readiness
established — Membership — Meetings.
(a) This subchapter establishes the Council on Postsecondary Education
and Career Readiness to facilitate the collaboration of kindergarten,
elementary, secondary, and postsecondary educational institutions in Arkansas
in developing college and career readiness standards that align school
curriculum and graduation standards with postsecondary education requirements
and business community expectations for employability.
(b) The council shall consist of eleven (11) members as follows:
(1) The Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education or
his or her designee;
(2) The Commissioner of the Division of Higher Education or his
or her designee;
(3) The Director of the Division of Career and Technical
Education or his or her designee;
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(4) The Director of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission
or his or her designee;
(5) The Director of the Division of Workforce Services or his or
her designee;
(6) A president or chancellor of an Arkansas four-year
institution of higher education or his or her designee, appointed annually by
the Commissioner of the Division of Higher Education;
(7) The Executive Director of the Arkansas Association of
Educational Administrators or his or her designee;
(8) The Executive Director of Arkansas Community Colleges or his
or her designee;
(9) The Executive Director of the Arkansas Education Association
or his or her designee;
(10) The Executive Director of the Arkansas School Boards
Association or his or her designee; and
(11) The President of the Arkansas State Chamber of Commerce and
the Associated Industries of Arkansas or his or her designee.
(c)(1) The Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education or his
or her designee shall call the first meeting of the council and serve as
chair for the first meeting.
(2) The first meeting shall occur within thirty (30) days of the
effective date of this subchapter.
(d) At the first meeting of the council and annually thereafter, the
voting members of the council shall elect one (1) member to serve as chair
for one (1) year.
(e)(1) All members are voting members except the chair, who may vote
only to break a tie vote.
(2) A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(f) The council shall meet at least three (3) times in a calendar
year.
(g) The Department of Education shall provide meeting space and staff
for the council.
(h) Council members shall serve without pay and shall not receive
expense reimbursement except from the agency or institution employing the
member.
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512

6-5-1103. Powers and duties.
(a) The Council on Postsecondary Education and Career Readiness shall:
(1) Develop a unified strategy to:
(A) Reduce remediation rates among high school graduates
entering postsecondary education by at least fifty percent (50%) by the year
2020; and
(B) Increase postsecondary graduation and completion
rates;
(2)(A) Support college and career readiness standards that:
(i) Require higher performance levels than those
currently required for high school graduation; and
(ii) Promote accelerated learning opportunities,
including without limitation Advanced Placement courses, concurrent credit
opportunities, and other accelerated opportunities with college or
vocational-technical school assistance to ensure that all students have the
skills to be successful in either employment or postsecondary education.
(B) College and career readiness standards shall be
implemented with the understanding that until July 1, 2022, interim high
school graduation standards may be used until the high school graduation
standards adopted by the State Board of Education are equal to the college
and career readiness standards;
(3) Develop a successful transition-to-work matrix that schools
and students may use to help students develop employment skills;
(4) Develop guidelines for secondary school intervention
programs and transitional courses;
(5) Develop guidelines for professional development for teachers
of transitional courses and opportunities for collaboration among high
school, vocational-technical school, and college faculty to ensure that
transitional courses target gaps in students' college and career readiness
skills; and
(6) Provide the reports required under this subchapter.
(b)(1) The council shall establish working groups of its members, or
staff of the agencies or institutions employing the members, to direct the
planning process and strategic implementation of its plans.
(2) The working groups shall:
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(A) Develop goals and action plans;
(B) Identify resources; and
(C) Determine expected outcomes to measure for each
strategy promoting college and career readiness and postsecondary completion.

6-5-1104. Reporting requirements.
(a) By June 30, 2014, the Council on Postsecondary Education and
Career Readiness shall:
(1) Develop a written plan to reduce remediation rates and
increase postsecondary graduation rates, including without limitation:
(A) Annual goals;
(B) Action strategies;
(C) Assigned responsibilities for implementing strategies;
(D) Timelines; and
(E) Reporting mechanisms;
(2) Provide the written plan to:
(A) The House Committee on Education and the Senate
Committee on Education;
(B) The board of directors of each school district and
open-enrollment charter school in this state; and
(C) The governing board of each state-supported
institution of higher education in this state; and
(3) Encourage each school district board of directors and the
governing board of each state-supported institution of higher education in
the state to participate in the council's plan and to work collaboratively to
reduce the remediation rates and further postsecondary graduation and
completion rates.
(b) By June 30, 2015, and annually thereafter, the council shall
report to the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on
Education:
(1) The progress of the council's work for the year; and
(2) Its recommendations, which may include without limitation
proposals for legislative action.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 5, Subchapter 12 is amended
to read as follows:
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
Subchapter 12 — Advanced Placement Training and Incentive Program Accelerated
Learning

6-5-1201. Established Definition.
There is established the Advanced Placement Training and Incentive
Program.
As used in this subchapter, “accelerated learning” means an organized
method of learning that enables a student to meet individual academic goals
and graduation requirements while pursuing higher levels of skill
development, including without limitation the following coursework:
(1) A College Board pre-Advanced Placement and Advanced
Placement course;
(2) An International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme course;
(3) A Cambridge Advanced International Certificate of Education
course;
(4) A concurrent credit course; and
(5) A substantively similar course or program approved by the
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education.

6-5-1202. Purpose of Advanced Placement Training and Incentive Program
accelerated learning — Grant funding.
(a) The purpose of the Advanced Placement Training and Incentive
Program accelerated learning is to:
(1) Prepare more students for:
(A) Success in higher education;
(B) Postsecondary training; and
(C) Careers in science, technology, engineering, and
mathematics High-wage, high-demand careers;
(2) Increase the number of students who graduate from
institutions of higher education; and
(3) Support and enhance Advanced Placement accelerated learning
initiatives already operating in the state.
(b)(1) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
provide grant funding to organizations that implement measures to achieve the
goals of the Advanced Placement Training and Incentive Program accelerated
learning as determined by the division.
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(2) An organization that receives grant funding to implement the
Advanced Placement Training and Incentive Program under this subchapter
shall:
(A) Be affiliated with the National Math and Science
Initiative; and
(B) Have demonstrated success with an Advanced Placement
Training and Incentive Program.
(3) An organization that receives grant funding to provide the
Advanced Placement Training and Incentive Program accelerated learning may
without limitation:
(A) Develop public-private partnerships to advance math
and science learning opportunities;
(B) Generate revenue from public or private sector
entities to support other opportunities; or and
(C) Accept grants, donations, gifts, or bequests.
(c) Grant funding provided by the division to an organization under
this subchapter shall be used to:
(1) Support and enhance the Advanced Placement Training and
Incentive Program accelerated learning;
(2) Pay for personal services and operating expenses required to
carry out the Advanced Placement Training and Incentive Program accelerated
learning; and
(3) Pay for technology, materials, assessments, and other
resources used in the Advanced Placement Training and Incentive Program
accelerated learning.

6-5-1203. Components and goals of Advanced Placement Training and
Incentive Program accelerated learning.
(a) The Advanced Placement Training and Incentive Program Accelerated
learning shall:
(1) Provide advanced placement accelerated learning content
directors to work, mentor, and provide resources to advanced placement and
pre-advanced placement accelerated learning teachers in the areas of:
(A) Mathematics;
(B) Science; and
(C) English;
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(2) Provide nationally recognized professional development for
advanced placement and pre-advanced placement accelerated learning teachers
that will enhance the knowledge and pedagogical skills of the teachers; and
(3) Develop and provide materials and resources for advanced
placement and pre-advanced placement accelerated learning teachers.
(b) The overall goal of the Advanced Placement Training and Incentive
Program accelerated learning is to:
(1) Increase the number of students enrolled in Advanced
Placement accelerated learning mathematics, science, and English;
(2) Increase the number of students who score three (3) or more
on Advanced Placement exams;
(3) Reduce the participation gaps and performance gaps in
Advanced Placement classes between African-American, Hispanic, and Caucasian
students;
(4) Help public high schools Ensure school districts develop
strong and successful Advanced Placement programs accelerated learning for
public high schools;
(5)(3) Enhance and augment Advanced Placement accelerated
learning policies and initiatives in Arkansas;
(6)(4) Provide the Advanced Placement Training and Incentive
Program accelerated learning in every public high school that elects to
participate and strengthen its Advanced Placement program accelerated
learning; and
(7) (5) Increase the number of students prepared to enter
science, technology, engineering, and mathematics fields in higher education
or related training and occupations.

6-5-1204. Participation in Advanced Placement Training and Incentive
Program accelerated learning.
(a) An organization that receives grant funding to provide the
Advanced Placement Training and Incentive Program accelerated learning shall
publish a list of program fees on or before June 1 each year.
(b) A public high school is eligible to participate in the Advanced
Placement Training and Incentive Program accelerated learning.
(c)(1) A public high school that chooses to participate in the
Advanced Placement Training and Incentive Program school's accelerated
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
learning shall pay a participation and the required service fee determined by
the organization.
(2) A public high school may choose either to participate fully
in the Advanced Placement Training and Incentive Program or to participate on
a limited basis, in which case the public high school shall pay a fee for
each service the public high school elects to use.

6-5-1205. Funding for accelerated learning.
(a) Contingent upon legislative appropriations and based on criteria
established by the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education, a school
that is offering accelerated learning may be awarded a one-time equipment and
instructional materials grant for providing an accelerated learning course.
(b) Contingent upon legislative appropriation and the availability of
funding, the state may pay in full or on a pro rata basis the cost of the
accelerated learning test fees.
(c) The State Board of Education may promulgate rules to implement
this subchapter.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-13-629(a)(3)-(5), concerning the training
and instruction regarding interpretation of audit reports that school board
of directors members must receive, is amended to read as follows:
(3)(A) The training and instruction required under this section
shall include:
(i) Topics relevant to school laws and school
operations;
(ii) The powers, duties, and responsibilities of the
members of the a board of directors, including without limitation:
(a) Legal requirements, including without
limitation:
(1) The items listed or required by the
Legislative Joint Auditing Committee under § 6-1-101; and
(2) Other financial laws, rules, or
federal regulations designated by the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education;
(b) Role differentiation;
(c) Financial management, including without
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
limitation how to read and interpret an audit report; and
(d) Improving student achievement; and
(iii) Information regarding school safety and
student discipline.
(B) The training or instruction on how to read and
interpret an audit report required under subdivision (a)(3)(A)(ii)(c) of this
section shall be conducted:
(i) By a person who:
(a) Is licensed to practice accounting by the
Arkansas State Board of Public Accountancy;
(b) Has prior experience in conducting a
school district financial audit;
(c) Is not an employee of Arkansas Legislative
Audit unless the training or instruction is conducted for the boards of
directors of multiple school districts; and
(d) Is not the person conducting the annual
audit or other financial audit of the school district unless the training or
instruction is presented in a large group setting sponsored by a statewide or
regional organization that is attended by multiple school districts;
(ii) Under the consultation or supervision of an
individual who qualifies under subdivision (a)(3)(B)(i) of this section as
part of a program that is provided:
(a) By an institution of higher education
located in Arkansas; or
(b) From instruction sponsored or approved by
the Department of Education; or
(c) By an in-service training conducted by or
through the Arkansas School Boards Association; and
(iii) By electronic means or in person, or both.
(4) Hours of training and instruction obtained in excess of the
minimum requirements each year may accumulate and be carried forward from
year to year.
(5) This instruction may be received from an institution of
higher education in this state, or from instruction sponsored or approved by
the Department of Education, or by an in-service training program conducted
by or through the Arkansas School Boards Association department.
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 6-13-808 is repealed.
6-13-808. The Arkansas Traveling Teacher Program.
(a) The Arkansas Traveling Teacher Program is hereby established and
shall be administered by the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education
with the assistance of public school districts and education service
cooperatives.
(b)(1) Pursuant to the provisions of this section, and to the extent
sufficient funding is available, the following persons and public school
districts may enter into an agreement to provide traveling teacher services
for one (1) or more receiving school districts for one (1) or more courses
required by the Standards for Accreditation of Arkansas Public Schools and
School Districts and any Advanced Placement courses required by § 6-16-1204:
(A) A traveling teacher who is appropriately licensed in
Arkansas as a teacher and employed on a full-time equivalent basis by a host
school district;
(B) A host school district that is an Arkansas public
school district with a student population of eight thousand (8,000) students
or fewer and that desires to provide traveling teacher services to a
receiving school district; and
(C) A receiving school district that is a public school
district other than the host school district and that desires to receive
traveling teacher services.
(2) The parties shall enter into a written agreement, in the
form established by the division, that shall include without limitation the
following:
(A) That the traveling teacher is to provide professional
teaching services to the receiving school district for one (1) or more
required courses;
(B) The amount of the bonus to be provided to the
traveling teacher under subdivision (c)(1)(A) of this section;
(C) For each course to be taught under the agreement:
(i) A description of the course;
(ii) The time and day for teaching each course; and
(iii) The exact location where the course will be
taught;
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(D)(i) Whether the agreement is for a school semester or a
school year.
(ii) No agreement shall be for a time period longer
than a school year or shorter than a school semester;
(E)(i) That the receiving school district will reimburse
the host school district for the time the traveling teacher is not working in
the host school district.
(ii) The reimbursement shall be the receiving school
district's pro rata share of the traveling teacher's time based on the hourly
rate of the traveling teacher's contract with the host school district;
(F) That at all times during the period of the agreement,
the traveling teacher is an employee of the host school district and is
subject to the personnel policies and contractual obligations of the host
school district; and
(G)(i) That sufficient time will be allowed for the
traveling teacher to travel to and from the host school district and the
receiving school district.
(ii) The division shall not approve an agreement
under this section unless the agreement requires the traveling teacher to be
physically present in the receiving school district while the traveling
teacher is teaching any course specified in the agreement.
(3) The agreement shall be reviewed and approved by the division
under subsection (f) of this section.
(c) To the extent the agreement is approved by the division:
(1)(A) Upon completion of the traveling teacher's services
provided under the agreement and under the terms of the agreement, the host
school district shall pay the traveling teacher, in addition to the amount
required by the teacher's annual teacher's contract with the host school
district a bonus of either:
(i) Two thousand dollars ($2,000) for a semester
agreement; or
(ii) Four thousand dollars ($4,000) for a full school
year agreement.
(B) The division shall reimburse the host school district
for the amount of bonus paid to the traveling teacher; and
(2)(A) The host school district shall reimburse the traveling
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
teacher for expenses related to travel to and from a receiving school
district at the appropriate state rate of reimbursement in existence and
approved by the Department of Finance and Administration for the school year
in which the traveling teacher's services are provided.
(B) The division shall reimburse the host school district
for the amount of travel reimbursement paid by the host school district to
the traveling teacher.
(d) Neither the division nor the State of Arkansas shall be obligated
or liable to reimburse any bonus or travel expenses incurred under an
agreement for traveling teacher services under this section if the division
has not reviewed and approved the entire agreement.
(e) The division may, if feasible and if funding is available,
establish an online registry of public school teachers willing to enter into
an agreement for traveling teacher services under this section with
information concerning the teacher's employing school district and any course
the teacher is qualified to teach.
(f)(1) All proposed agreements among a host school district, a
receiving school district, and a traveling teacher shall be submitted to the
division by a date certain for review and approval by the division.
(2) The division shall review each agreement with all requisite
authority to approve or deny the agreement based on the provisions of law,
rule, availability of funding, and discretionary determination as to the best
use of state resources and funding.
(3) The division shall endeavor to consider approval of an
agreement to:
(A) Place a traveling teacher with a receiving school
district to maximize the efficiency of the traveling teacher's service to
both the host and receiving school districts; and
(B) Minimize the extent and duration of any travel
required.
(g)(1) The division shall establish any rules and agreement forms
necessary for the administration of the Arkansas Traveling Teacher Program.
(2) In establishing the rules, the division shall:
(A) Prioritize the approval of agreements for traveling
teacher services based on subject-area course needs;
(B) Establish appropriate travel limitations;
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(C) Develop a method of equitable distribution of
traveling teachers among the area's education service cooperatives; and
(D) Provide a means by which education service
cooperatives may assist in facilitating traveling teachers.
(h) No provision of this section is intended or should be interpreted
to waive any immunity or defense of the State of Arkansas or its various
agencies, boards, or commissions and no person shall be deemed to have any
legal entitlement, recourse, or cause of action against the State of Arkansas
or its various agencies, boards, or commissions based on the terms,
conditions, or provisions of this section.
(i) [Repealed.]

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 6-15-202(f)(21), concerning reporting of
statutory requirements of accelerated learning by a superintendent, is
amended to read as follows:
(21) Section 6-16-1201 et seq. and § 6-5-1201 et seq. concerning
advanced placement and concurrent enrollment accelerated learning;

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 6-15-214 is amended to read as follows:
6-15-214. Advanced placement Accelerated learning course counted as
core curriculum course taught.
(a) The purpose of this section is to assist small, rural public
schools in providing students access to the most rigorous courses available
if it is the desire of students to take advanced placement accelerated
learning courses in the place of regular courses and, in doing so, to meet
the requirements of the Standards for Accreditation of Arkansas Public
Schools and School Districts.
(b)(1) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education acknowledges
that the rigor and level of difficulty of advanced placement accelerated
learning courses exceed the requirements of regular courses.
(2) Such rigor and level of difficulty are validated through the
required advanced placement audit and advanced placement examinations All
accelerated learning courses shall meet the approved program requirements.
(3) The State Board of Education may deny courses that do not
meet the approved program requirements.
(c) The State Board of Education state board shall consider an
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
advanced placement accelerated learning course as being taught for one (1) of
the required courses under the Standards for Accreditation of Arkansas Public
Schools and School Districts if:
(1) The public school district has a qualified teacher for the
required course;
(2) No students enrolled in the required course;
(3) An advanced placement accelerated learning course in the
same subject area as the required course has students enrolled in the
advanced placement accelerated learning course;
(4) The public school district teaches all other courses
required by the Standards for Accreditation of Arkansas Public Schools and
School Districts; and
(5)(A) The public school district teaches the required course to
any student who enrolls in the public school district after the school year
begins.
(B) The public school district may teach the required
course to a new student:
(i) In a traditional classroom setting;
(ii) Through distance learning with a qualified
teacher; or
(iii) By modifying the advanced placement accelerated
learning course on an individual level to accommodate the new student.
(d)(1) The public school district shall notify the division after
registration in the spring before the beginning of the new school year and
immediately after the school year begins if no students enrolled in the
required course and the public school district will seek to meet the
Standards for Accreditation of Arkansas Public Schools and School Districts
using the advanced placement accelerated learning course.
(2) Upon receiving the public school district notification and
after spring registration, the division shall permit the public school
district to meet the Standards for Accreditation of Arkansas Public Schools
and School Districts by teaching the advanced placement accelerated learning
course in place of the required course.
(e) If a new student enrolls in the required course, the public school
district shall immediately notify the division.
(f) The division shall establish procedures to ensure that no student
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
is coerced into taking an advanced placement accelerated learning course for
the purpose of meeting the Standards for Accreditation of Arkansas Public
Schools and School Districts.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 6-15-215 is repealed.
6-15-215. The Arkansas Smart Core Incentive Funding Program —
Definitions.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The skills and knowledge gained through Arkansas's Smart
Core curriculum provide the academic foundation required for high school
graduates to succeed in their first year of college or in a job that promises
a well-paying career track; and
(2) School districts should encourage all students who are
capable of completing the Smart Core curriculum to do so.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) “Eligible high school” means each public high school in a
school district that meets the criteria to receive incentive funding under
subsection (f) of this section and the program rules adopted under this
section by the State Board of Education;
(2) “Smart Core” means the curriculum established by the
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education under the Standards for
Accreditation of Arkansas Public Schools and School Districts that is part of
Smart Future, a state initiative focused on improving Arkansas public high
schools for all students; and
(3) “Smart Core graduate” means a student who graduated from an
Arkansas public high school after having successfully completed the Smart
Core curriculum.
(c) The Arkansas Smart Core Incentive Funding Program is established
to provide a financial incentive to:
(1) Assist with a public high school's efforts to encourage
public high school students to complete the Smart Core curriculum;
(2) Promote programs that contribute to student success,
including without limitation:
(A) Tutoring;
(B) Quality after-school and summer programs that may
include literacy, math, and science specialists in elementary school; and
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(C) Professional development for mathematics, science,
literacy, foreign language, and Advanced Placement instruction; and
(3) Provide support to school counselors to improve student
services.
(d)(1)(A) A school district that receives incentive funding under this
section shall provide the incentive funding to each eligible high school in
the school district.
(B) The eligible high school shall spend the incentive
funding only for the purposes identified in subsection (c) of this section.
(2) A school district that receives incentive funding under the
program shall not use the incentive funding to provide increases to the
salary schedule of the school district.
(e)(1) Subject to an appropriation and available funding for the
program, the division shall pay incentive funding to a school district under
this section based on an annual percentage of Smart Core graduates from a
public high school in the school district.
(2)(A) The division shall make the calculation based on a
student record analysis conducted annually by the division beginning with the
graduating class of 2010.
(B) The division shall exclude from the student record
analysis a student with an individualized education program that does not
require the student to complete the Smart Core curriculum.
(f)(1) By June 30 of each year, the division shall pay to a school
district incentive funding under the program as follows:
(A) If one hundred percent (100%) of a public high
school's graduates in the immediately preceding school year completed the
Smart Core curriculum, the school district where the public high school is
located shall receive one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) per Smart Core
graduate;
(B) If at least ninety-five percent (95%) but less than
one hundred percent (100%) of a public high school's graduates in the
immediately preceding school year completed the Smart Core curriculum, the
school district where the public high school is located shall receive one
hundred dollars ($100) per Smart Core graduate; and
(C) If at least ninety percent (90%) but less than ninety-
five percent (95%) of a public high school's graduates in the immediately
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
preceding school year completed the Smart Core curriculum, the school
district where the public high school is located shall receive fifty dollars
($50.00) per Smart Core graduate.
(2) The division shall not pay incentive funding to a school
district for a public high school in which less than ninety percent (90%) of
its graduates complete the Smart Core curriculum.
(3) If a public high school's graduation rate falls below the
average graduation rate for the public high school for the previous three (3)
school years, the school district is not eligible to receive the full
incentive award under the program for the public high school.
(g) Participation in the program is voluntary.
(h) This section is effective from July 1, 2009, through June 30,
2020.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code §§ 6-15-901 and 6-15-902 are amended to read
as follows:
6-15-901. Definition.
For the purposes of this subchapter, “advanced placement course
accelerated learning” means a course of instruction that qualifies for
college credit and that is approved for credit as a high school course by the
State Board of Education an organized method of learning that enables a
student to meet individual academic goals and graduation requirements while
pursuing higher levels of skill development, including without limitation the
following coursework:
(1) A College Board pre-Advanced Placement and Advanced
Placement course;
(2) An International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme course;
(3) A Cambridge Advanced International Certificate of Education
course;
(4) A concurrent credit course; and
(5) A substantively similar course or program approved by the
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education.

6-15-902. Grading scale — Exemptions — Special education classes.
(a) The following grading scale shall be used by all public secondary
schools in the state for all courses, except Advanced Placement accelerated
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
learning courses, and approved courses for weighted credit, and courses
offered under the International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme:
(1) A = 90-100;
(2) B = 80-89;
(3) C = 70-79;
(4) D = 60-69; and
(5) F = 59 and below.
(b)(1) Each letter grade shall be given a numeric value for the
purpose of determining grade average.
(2) Except for Advanced Placement accelerated learning courses,
and approved courses for weighted credit, courses offered under the
International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme, and honors courses, the
numeric value for each letter grade shall be:
(A) A = 4 points;
(B) B = 3 points;
(C) C = 2 points;
(D) D = 1 point; and
(E) F = 0 points.
(c)(1) The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules for
accelerated learning and approved courses for weighted credit that address
the following:
(A) Adopt appropriate equivalents for advanced placement
and college courses; and
(B) Recommend a uniform grading structure for honors
courses.
(2) Weighted credit shall be allowed for advanced placement
courses and courses offered under the International Baccalaureate Diploma
Programme if:
(A) The student takes the entire Advanced Placement course
or the entire course offered in the International Baccalaureate Diploma
Programme in a particular subject;
(B) The student completes the applicable test offered by
the College Board for advanced placement courses at the end of the advanced
placement course or the applicable test offered by the International
Baccalaureate at the time prescribed by the organization; and
(C)(i) A teacher of an advanced placement course meets
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
Arkansas teacher licensure requirements and:
(a) Attends at least one (1) of the following
trainings no less than one (1) time every five (5) years:
(1) College Board Advanced Placement
Summer Institute;
(2) College Board-endorsed training; or
(3) Other similarly rigorous training
approved by the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education; or
(b) Completes an additional training plan for
Advanced Placement within three (3) years of commencing the additional
training plan; or
(ii) A teacher of a course offered under the
International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme meets Arkansas teacher
licensure requirements and attends the training required by the International
Baccalaureate Standards;
(B) Grading scales;
(C) A numeric value for the purpose of determining grade
average; and
(D) Weight given to the numeric value as provided in
subdivision (b)(2) of this section.
(3)(2) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education may
shall approve a course for weighted credit if the course:
(A) Exceeds the curriculum standards for a nonweighted
credit class; or
(B) Meets or exceeds the standards of a comparable
advanced placement class accelerated learning course; or
(C) Is identified by the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education as an honors class.
(4)(A)(3)(A) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education
in collaboration with the Division of Career and Technical Education may
approve a career and technical course within an approved career and technical
pathway for weighted credit if the course:
(i) Exceeds the curriculum standards for a
nonweighted class; and
(ii) Leads to an approved industry-recognized
certification or concurrent credit.
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(B) The Division of Career and Technical Education shall:
(i) Review new and existing career and technical
pathways to determine which courses within the career and technical pathways
meet criteria for weighted credit; and
(ii) Publish a list of approved career and technical
pathways annually by January 1.
(C) Criteria used to determine what courses within a
career and technical pathway shall receive weighted credit shall include
without limitation the consideration of career and technical pathways that:
(i) Lead to high-value industry credentials; and
(ii) Align to state and local workforce data.
(D) Weighted credit awarded under subdivision (c)(4)(A)
(c)(3)(A) of this section shall be awarded for each course upon:
(i) Completing the relevant career and technical
pathway; and
(ii) Earning the high-value industry credential
aligned with the career and technical pathway.
(5)(A) A local school district board of directors may adopt a
policy to allow high school students in the public school district to take
college courses for weighted credit equal to the numeric grade awarded in
Advanced Placement courses, courses offered under the International
Baccalaureate Diploma Programme, and honors classes.
(B)(i) If a local school district board of directors
adopts a policy under subdivision (c)(5)(A) of this section, the school
district shall apply to the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education
for approval.
(ii) An application under subdivision (c)(5)(B)(i) of
this section shall be reviewed for approval to assign a numeric grade value,
which may include weighted credit, based on the following:
(a) A letter from the superintendent of the
public school district or principal of the public school describing how the
course exceeds expectations for coursework required under the Standards for
Accreditation of Arkansas Public Schools and School Districts; and
(b) The grade level or levels of public school
students who will be enrolled in the course.
(d) A public school district may use the grading scale in this section
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
in the public school district's elementary schools.
(e) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education may promulgate
rules to implement this section.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 6-15-1004(b)(2)(C), concerning the
continuing education and professional development requirement under the
Standards for Accreditation of Arkansas Public Schools and School Districts,
is amended to read as follows:
(C) For purposes of the requirement for continuing
education and professional development under this section, each hour of
training received by licensed personnel related to teaching an advanced
placement class for a subject covered by the College Board and Educational
Testing Service accelerated learning course shall be counted as professional
development up to a maximum of thirty (30) hours.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 6-15-1301(b)(1), concerning the membership
of the Safe Schools Committee under the Safe Schools Initiative Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) The Safe Schools Committee shall be composed of the following
individuals and stakeholders deemed necessary and appointed by the
Commissioner of the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education:
(A) One (1) classroom teacher appointed by the Arkansas
Education Association;
(B) Two (2) school administrators appointed by the
Arkansas Association of Educational Administrators;
(C) Two (2) school district board members appointed by the
Arkansas School Boards Association;
(D) A staff member of the division appointed by the
Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education;
(E) A school safety specialist, employed by an Arkansas
school district, appointed by the commissioner;
(F) One (1) school counselor appointed by the Arkansas
Counseling Association;
(G) The Director of the Criminal Justice Institute and of
the Arkansas Center for School Safety, or his or her designee;
(H) One (1) classroom teacher appointed by the Arkansas
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
State Teachers Association;
(I) The Director of the Division of Emergency Management,
or his or her designee;
(J) The Executive Director of the Arkansas Public School
Resource Center, Inc., or his or her designee;
(K) A chief of police or a sheriff appointed by the
commissioner;
(L) The Executive Director of the Arkansas Rural Ed
Association, or his or her designee;
(M) The State Fire Marshal, or his or her designee;
(N) One (1) school psychologist appointed by the Arkansas
School Psychology Association; and
(O) One (1) director of an Arkansas education service
cooperative appointed by the commissioner.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 6-15-1303(d)(3)(A), concerning the
provision of training and technical assistance under the Safe Schools
Initiative Act, is amended to read as follows:
(3)(A) The Arkansas Center for School Safety of the Criminal Justice
Institute shall be the state school safety clearinghouse and shall
collaborate with the following entities to provide a comprehensive,
efficient, and effective resource for education and law enforcement personnel
to obtain training and technical assistance to meet the school safety needs
of students in this state:
(i) The Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education;
(ii) The Safe Schools Committee established under
this subchapter; and
(iii) The Arkansas Association of Educational
Administrators;
(iv) The Arkansas School Boards Association;
(v) Education service cooperatives;
(vi) The Division of Emergency Management;
(vii) The Arkansas Public School Resource Center,
Inc.; and
(viii) Other key stakeholders.
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 15, Subchapter 21, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-15-2102. Definition.
As used in this subchapter, "school" includes a public school within a
traditional public school district and an open-enrollment public charter
school.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 6-15-2108 is amended to read as follows:
6-15-2108. School rating system.
(a) The school rating system shall be a multiple-measures approach
that shall include without limitation:
(1) Academic achievement on the annual statewide student
assessment;
(2) Student growth on the annual statewide student assessment;
and
(3) School-level graduation rate or rates; and
(4) English-learner progress or growth in acquiring English.
(b) The school rating system shall consider without limitation at
least one (1) or more of the following indicators:
(1) Closing the achievement gap;
(2) Academic growth of student subgroups, including without
limitation economically disadvantaged students, students from major racial
and ethnic groups, English learners, and students with disabilities;
(3) The percentage of the grade nine (9) cohort with on-time
completion of credit attainment at the end of grade nine (9);
(4) Equity in resource allocation;
(5) The percentage of students who earn:
(A) Advanced placement credit;
(B) Concurrent credit;
(C) International Baccalaureate credit; or
(D) Industry-recognized certification that leads to
articulated or concurrent credit at a postsecondary institution;
(6) Student access to multiple flexible learning continua,
including but not limited to personalized, competency, or mastery learning;
(7) Student access to preschool offered by the public school
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
district;
(8) The proportional percentage of qualified educators who hold
a National Board for Professional Teaching Standards certification or have an
advanced degree beyond their bachelor's degree; and
(9) Public school district and community partnerships.
(c)(b) Indicators included or considered as part of the school rating
system shall:
(1) Allow for meaningful differentiation in school performance;
and
(2) Be valid, reliable, comparable, and applicable statewide.
(d)(c) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall:
(1) promulgate Promulgate rules to implement this section; and
(2) Develop a formula to determine a letter grade under § 6-15-
2105 for the following without limitation:
(A) A public school district; and
(B) An education service cooperative.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 6-16-140(a), concerning a certificate of
attainment awarded to a student completing an approved vocational or
technical career pathway or program of study at a public high school, is
amended to read as follows:
(a) A student who successfully completes an approved vocational or
technical career pathway or program of study at a public high school shall be
awarded a certificate of attainment that shall be:
(1) Aligned in the appropriate career pathway or program of
study; and
(2) Used for consideration of acceptance and advanced priority
placement into an apprenticeship training program.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 6-16-148(a)(1), concerning the foundation
of certain social studies or history courses offered in grades seven through
twelve (7-12), is amended to read as follows:
(1) A social studies or history course conditioned upon
knowledge of historical events from the colonial period to modern times of
United States history for which graduation credit is or may be received,
except for advanced placement courses
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 16, Subchapter 8, is
repealed.
Subchapter 8 — Arkansas Advanced Placement and International Baccalaureate
Diploma Incentive Program Act of 1995
6-16-801. Title.
This subchapter shall be known as and may be cited as the “Arkansas
Advanced Placement and International Baccalaureate Diploma Incentive Program
Act of 1995”.

6-16-802. Purpose.
(a) The purpose of this subchapter is to serve as a legislative
charter for the establishment, organization, and administration of a program
designed to improve the course offerings available to middle school, junior
high school, and high school students throughout the state.
(b) The program established under this subchapter will provide
advanced educational courses that are easily accessible and that will prepare
students for admission to and success in a postsecondary educational
environment.
(c) A key component in the program is adequately preparing teachers
and schools in providing advanced placement courses or courses offered under
the International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme to their students.

6-16-803. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Advanced placement course” means a high school level
preparatory course for a college advanced placement test that incorporates
all topics specified by the College Board and Educational Testing Service on
its standard syllabus for a given subject area and is approved by the College
Board and Educational Testing Service;
(2) “College advanced placement test” means the advanced
placement test administered by the College Board and Educational Testing
Service;
(3) “College Board” means the College Board and Educational
Testing Service;
(4) “International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme” means an
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
international education program offered by the International Baccalaureate;
(5) “Preadvanced placement course” means a middle school, junior
high school, or high school level course that specifically prepares students
to enroll and participate in an advanced placement course;
(6) “Program” means the Arkansas Advanced Placement and
International Baccalaureate Diploma Incentive Program; and
(7) “State board” means the State Board of Education.

6-16-804. Established — Subsidies — Rules.
(a) The Arkansas Advanced Placement and International Baccalaureate
Diploma Incentive Program is hereby established, to be administered by the
Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education.
(b) Contingent upon legislative appropriations and based on criteria
established by the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education, schools
participating in the program may be awarded a one-time equipment and
instructional materials grant for providing an advanced placement course or a
course offered under the International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme.
(c) Subject to legislative appropriations, a teacher participating in
the advanced placement program, in the International Baccalaureate Diploma
Programme, or in the preadvanced placement program may be awarded subsidized
teacher training for advanced placement courses at a cost not to exceed six
hundred fifty dollars ($650) per teacher.
(d)(1) Contingent upon legislative appropriation and the availability
of funding, the state may pay in full, or on a pro rata basis as determined
under subdivision (d)(2) of this section, the cost of the advanced placement
test fee or the equivalent test fee under the International Baccalaureate
Diploma Programme, or both.
(2) The State Board of Education may create a sliding scale
based on family income.
(e) The state board is authorized to promulgate rules necessary to
implement this subchapter.

6-16-805. Funding.
(a) The awards granted under the provisions of this subchapter for
both advanced placement and the International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme
may be funded by donations, grants, or legislative appropriation.
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(b) All donations, grants, and appropriations received shall be
accounted for by the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education.
(c) The Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education may solicit
and receive donations and grants for the purpose of making awards.

6-16-806. Treatment as advanced placement course.
Any high school course offered under the International Baccalaureate
Diploma Programme shall be treated the same as an advanced placement course,
including for the following purposes:
(1) Weighted credit;
(2) The Arkansas Advanced Placement and International
Baccalaureate Diploma Incentive Program Act of 1995, § 6-16-801 et seq.; and
(3) Reporting requirements.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code §§ 6-16-1202 through 6-16-1204 are amended
to read as follows:
6-16-1202. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Advanced Placement course” means a high school level
preparatory course for a college Advanced Placement test that:
(A) Incorporates all topics specified by the College Board
and Educational Testing Service on its standards syllabus for a given subject
area; and
(B) Is approved by the College Board and Educational
Testing Service;
(2) “Endorsed concurrent enrollment course” means a college-
level course offered by an institution of higher education in this state that
upon completion would qualify for academic credit in both the institution of
higher education and a public high school that:
(A) Is in one (1) of the four (4) core areas of math,
English, science, and social studies;
(B) Meets the requirements of § 6-16-1204(b); and
(C) Is listed in the Arkansas Course Transfer System of
the Division of Higher Education;
(3) “Pre-Advanced Placement course” means a middle school,
junior high school, or high school level course that specifically prepares
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
students to enroll and to participate in an advanced placement course; and
(4) “Vertical team” means a group of educators from different
grade levels in a given discipline who work cooperatively to develop and
implement a vertically aligned program aimed at helping students from diverse
backgrounds acquire the academic skills necessary for success in the Advanced
Placement program and other challenging coursework "Accelerated learning"
means an organized method of learning that enables students to meet
individual academic goals and graduation requirements while pursuing higher
levels of skill development, including without limitation the following
coursework:
(A) A College Board pre-Advanced Placement and Advanced
Placement course;
(B) An International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme
course;
(C) A Cambridge Advanced International Certificate of
Education course;
(D) A concurrent credit course; and
(E) A substantively similar course or program approved by
the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education; and
(2) "Concurrent credit course" means a college-level course offered by
an institution of higher education in this state that upon completion would
qualify for academic credit in both the institution of higher education and a
public high school.

6-16-1203. Teacher skills and training.
(a)(1) A teacher of an Advanced Placement course must obtain
appropriate training.
(2) The State Board of Education shall establish clear,
specific, and challenging training guidelines that require teachers of
College Board advanced placement courses and teachers of pre-Advanced
Placement courses to obtain College Board sponsored or endorsed training.
(3) The training may include vertical team training.
(b)(a) An instructor of an endorsed concurrent enrollment an
accelerated learning or concurrent credit course shall have meet the
requirements of the:
(1) Institution of higher education that is offering the course;
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
or
(2) Accrediting organization authorized under § 6-16-1202:
(1)(A) No less than a master's degree that includes at least
eighteen (18) hours of completed course work in the subject area of the
endorsed concurrent enrollment course.
(B)(b)(1) The An instructor's credentials shall be
approved by the academic unit or chief academic officer of the institution of
higher education offering the endorsed concurrent credit enrollment course;
and.
(2) The relevant credentials and experience necessary to teach
from the syllabus approved by the institution of higher education granting
the course credit.

6-16-1204. Implementation.
(a)(1) In order to prepare students for the rigor inherent in Advanced
Placement courses, school districts shall offer pre-Advanced Placement
courses to prepare students for the demands of Advanced Placement coursework.
(2) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
approve all classes designated as pre-Advanced Placement courses.
(b) An endorsed A concurrent credit enrollment course must meet the
following requirements:
(1) The course must be a course offered by an institution of
higher education in this state that is:
(A) Approved through the institution of higher education's
normal process; and
(B) Listed in the institution of higher education's
catalog;
(2) The course content and instruction must meet the same
standards and adopt the same learning outcomes as those developed for a
course taught on the campus of the institution of higher education, including
without limitation:
(A) The administration of any departmental exams
applicable to the course; and
(B) The use of substantially the same book and syllabus as
is used at the college level;
(3) The course must be taught by an instructor with the
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
qualifications required under § 6-16-1203(b) § 6-16-1203;
(4) The institution of higher education offering the course
must:
(A) Provide to the course instructor staff development,
supervision, and evaluation; and
(B)(i) Provide the students enrolled in the course with:
(a) Academic guidance counseling; and
(b) The opportunity to utilize the on-campus
library or other academic resources of the institution of higher education.
(ii) Nothing in this This subdivision (b)(4) (a)(4)
shall not preclude institutions of higher education from collaborating to
meet the requirements of this subdivision (b)(4)(a)(4);
(5) To be eligible to enroll in an endorsed a concurrent
enrollment credit course, the student must:
(A) Be admitted by the institution of higher education as
a nondegree or noncertificate-seeking student; and
(B) Meet all of the prerequisites for the course in which
he or she is enrolled; and
(6)(A) Credit for the endorsed concurrent enrollment credit
course may only be awarded by the institution of higher education offering
the course.
(B) Nothing in this This subdivision (b)(6) (a)(6) shall
not preclude institutions of higher education from collaborating to provide
the course and award course credit.
(c)(b) Beginning with the 2008-2009 2025-2026 school year, all public
school districts and open-enrollment public charter schools shall offer one
(1) College Board Advanced Placement course in each of the four (4) core
areas of math, English, science, and social studies for a total of four (4)
courses at least four (4) accelerated learning courses that cover the
following subject areas:
(1) Math;
(2) English;
(3) Science; and
(4) Social studies.
(d)(1) The requirement under subsection (c) of this section shall be
phased in over a period of four (4) years beginning with the 2005-2006 school
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
year.
(2) Beginning with the 2008-2009 school year, all high schools
in Arkansas shall offer a minimum of four (4) Advanced Placement courses by
adding at least one (1) core course each year to the list of courses
available to high school students.
(e)(1)(A) A state-supported two-year or four-year institution of
higher education may offer a reduced tuition rate for endorsed concurrent
enrollment courses offered by the institution of higher education to high
school students under this subchapter.
(B) The reduction in tuition under subdivision (e)(1)(A)
of this section or any tuition paid by the institution of higher education
under subdivision (e)(3)(B) of this section shall not be considered an
institutional scholarship.
(2) The number of students enrolled and the semester credit
hours for endorsed concurrent enrollment courses shall be included in the
calculation of full-time-equivalent enrollment for the institution of higher
education.
(3)(A) A national school lunch student, as defined in § 6-20-
2303, shall not be required to pay any of the costs up to a maximum of six
(6) credit hours of endorsed concurrent enrollment courses that are taught:
(i) On the grounds of the public school district in
which the student is enrolled; and
(ii) By a teacher employed by the public school
district in which the student is enrolled.
(B) The costs for endorsed concurrent enrollment courses
under subdivision (e)(3)(A) of this section shall be paid:
(i) By the public school district in which the
student is enrolled;
(ii) By the institution of higher education offering
the course; or
(iii) Through a cost-sharing agreement between the
public school district and the institution of higher education.
(c)(1) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year and each year
thereafter, the tuition rate for a concurrent credit course offered by a
public school district or open-enrollment public charter school in
partnership with an institution of higher education shall:
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(A) For every one (1) academic credit hour provided by an
institution of higher education, be an agreed amount that is not:
(i) More than two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the
per-pupil amount established under § 6-20-2305 that is allotted per student
each year; and
(ii) Less than one-half percent (0.5%) of the per-
pupil amount established under § 6-20-2305 that is allotted per student each
year; and
(B) Not exceed the standard tuition rate and fee structure
of the institution of higher education providing the concurrent credit
course.
(2)(A) The amount established under subdivision (c)(1)(A) of
this section may be satisfied through the following sources:
(i) ACCESS to Acceleration Scholarship Program
funds;
(ii) Funding from the school district where a
student is enrolled;
(iii) Other consideration agreed to by the public
school district or open-enrollment public charter school and institution of
higher education; and
(iv) Any other available sources as determined by
the Division of Higher Education.
(B) An institution of higher education shall not receive
funding for concurrent credit courses for tuition at secondary vocational
centers under § 6-51-301 et seq. if the institution of higher education is
already receiving funding designated for vocational center aid.
(3) A student or a student’s parent or guardian shall not be
responsible for tuition, fees, or materials for participation in a concurrent
credit course.

SECTION 21. Arkansas Code § 6-17-309 is amended to read as follows:
6-17-309. Licensure — Waiver.
(a)(1) A class of students shall not be under the instruction of a
teacher who is not licensed to teach the grade level or subject matter of the
class for more than sixty (60) consecutive school days in the same class
during a school year.
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(2)(b) This subsection Subsection (a) of this section shall not
apply to:
(A)(1) Nondegreed vocational-technical teachers;
(B)(2) Individuals approved by the Division of Elementary
and Secondary Education to teach the grade level or subject matter of the
class in the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education's distance
learning program;
(C)(3) Individuals teaching concurrent credit courses or
advanced placement accelerated learning courses who:
(i)(A) Are employed by a postsecondary institution;
(ii)(B) Meet the qualification requirements of a
postsecondary institution or the Division of Career and Technical Education;
and
(iii)(C) Are teaching in a course in which credit is
offered by an institution of higher education or a technical institute;
(D)(4) Licensed teachers teaching in one (1) of the
following settings:
(i)(A) An alternative learning environment;
(ii)(B) A juvenile detention facility;
(iii)(C) A residential and day alcohol, drug, and
psychiatric facility program;
(iv)(D) An emergency youth shelter;
(v)(E) A facility of the Division of Youth Services;
or
(vi)(F) A facility of the Division of Developmental
Disabilities Services;
(E)(5) Licensed special education teachers who are
teaching two (2) or more core academic subjects exclusively to children with
disabilities; or
(F)(6) Teachers who are working under an Aspiring Teacher
permit for a period of time not to exceed one (1) academic year or two (2)
consecutive semesters.
(b)(1) If this requirement imposes an undue hardship on a school
district, the school district may apply to the State Board of Education for a
waiver.
(2) The state board shall develop rules for granting a waiver.
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(3) Any school district that obtains a waiver shall send written
notice of the assignment to the parent or guardian of each student in the
classroom no later than the sixtieth school day after the date of the
assignment.
(4) [Repealed.]

SECTION 22. Arkansas Code § 6-17-709(d), concerning the professional
development schedule for licensed educators, is amended to read as follows:
(d) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall establish
the curriculum under this section in collaboration with educational agencies
and associations, including without limitation the: relevant stakeholders.
(1) Division of Higher Education;
(2) Arkansas Association of Educational Administrators;
(3) Arkansas Education Association;
(4) Arkansas School Boards Association;
(5) Arkansas Association for Supervision and Curriculum
Development;
(6) Arkansas State Teachers Association; and
(7) Arkansas Rural Ed Association.

SECTION 23. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 18, Subchapter 2, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-18-237. Absences for certain purposes unexcused.
(a) A public school district or an open-enrollment public charter
school shall not grant excused absences for purposes of political protest.
(b) A public school district or an open-enrollment public charter
school may grant an excused absence for the following purposes with written
consent of a parent, legal guardian, or person standing in loco parentis to
the student:
(1) Social or public policy advocacy; or
(2) Attempts to influence legislation or other governmental
policy-making at the local, state, or federal level.
(c) This section does not prohibit students from attending curricular
or cocurricular activities approved by the public school district or open-
enrollment public charter school for credit.
(d) A public school district or an open-enrollment public charter
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
school that grants excused or unexcused absences under subsections (a) or (b)
of this section shall provide a report by June 30 each year to the Division
of Elementary and Secondary Education that contains the following:
(1) The number of absences requested under this section;
(2) The number of absences granted under this section; and
(3) The stated purposes of the absence.

SECTION 24. Arkansas Code § 6-18-1104(b), concerning parental
notification and permission related to school fundraising programs, is
amended to read as follows:
(b) A one-page form for parental notification and permission shall be
developed by the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education in
cooperation with school administrators and the Arkansas Parent Teacher
Association.

SECTION 25. Arkansas Code § 6-18-2004(b)(2)(G)(vi), concerning the
direct and indirect services offered as comprehensive student services by a
school counselor as part of a contributing member of a decision-making team
in advanced placement and gifted and talented programs, is amended to read as
follows:
(vi) Advanced placement Accelerated learning and
gifted and talented programs.

SECTION 26. Arkansas Code § 6-18-2004(c), concerning administrative
activities performed by a school counselor, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) Administrative activities performed by a school counselor shall
not exceed more than ten percent (10%) of the school counselor's time spent
working during student contact days.
(2) Administrative activities provided by a school counselor in
collaboration with other school personnel include without limitation:
(A) Coordinating state assessments, cognitive achievement
assessments, advanced placement accelerated learning programs, and English
language proficiency testing programs;
(B) Developing master schedules;
(C) Coordinating of:
(i) Teams convened under Section 504 of the
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
Rehabilitation Act of 1973, Pub. L. No. 93-112;
(ii) Response-to-intervention teams;
(iii) English learner programs;
(iv) Parental involvement or family engagement
programs;
(v) Positive behavioral intervention support
programs;
(vi) Data entry; and
(vii) Advanced placement Accelerated learning and
gifted and talented programs; and
(D) Monitoring students in common areas such as the
cafeteria, hallway, playground, and bus lines.

SECTION 27. Arkansas Code § 6-20-2203(a)(4), concerning the
development by the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education of the
Arkansas Financial Accounting Handbook, is amended to read as follows:
(4) The rules shall be developed by the state board in
cooperation with the division, and representatives from the Arkansas
Association of Educational Administrators, the Arkansas Association of School
Business Officials, the Arkansas Education Association, the education service
cooperatives, and the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.

SECTION 28. Arkansas Code § 6-20-2204(a)(3)(A), concerning required
training for public school districts, open-enrollment public charter schools,
and education service cooperatives under the Arkansas Educational Financial
Accounting and Reporting Act of 2004, is amended to read as follows:
(3)(A) The instruction may be provided by an institution of
higher education in this state, from instruction sponsored by the division,
by an in-service training program conducted by the Arkansas Association of
School Business Officials, or from another provider.

SECTION 29. Arkansas Code § 6-20-2204(b)(2), concerning required Tier
II training for public school districts, open-enrollment public charter
schools, and education service cooperatives under the Arkansas Educational
Financial Accounting and Reporting Act of 2004, is amended to read as
follows:
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(2) Tier II training shall be developed by the division in
cooperation with representatives from the Arkansas Association of Educational
Administrators, the Arkansas Association of School Business Officials, the
Arkansas Education Association, the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, and
the education service cooperatives.

SECTION 30. Arkansas Code § 6-20-2207(b)(1), concerning the rules
governing the uniform budget and accounting system for school districts,
education service cooperatives, and open-enrollment public charter schools,
is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1)(A) The state board shall amend the rules, and the Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education shall amend the Arkansas Financial
Accounting Handbook provided in subsection (a) of this section as necessary.
(B) The amendments, annual revisions, and financial
accounting updates to the Arkansas Financial Accounting Handbook shall be
developed with representatives from the Arkansas Association of School
Business Officials, the education service cooperatives, and other school
district officials as designated by the division.

SECTION 31. Arkansas Code § 6-21-113(a), concerning the membership of
the Advisory Committee on Public School Academic Facilities, is amended to
read as follows:
(a) To assist the Division of Public School Academic Facilities and
Transportation, there is established the Advisory Committee on Public School
Academic Facilities to be composed of the following members who must be
willing to devote adequate time to the work of the committee and who reflect
the demographics of the state:
(1) The Director of the Division of Public School Academic
Facilities and Transportation or the director's designee, who shall also
serve as secretary to the committee;
(2) One (1) person who is a licensed building contractor
experienced in public school construction selected from a list of no fewer
than three (3) names submitted by the Arkansas Chapter of the Associated
General Contractors of America;
(3) One (1) person who is a licensed architect experienced in
public school design submitted by the Arkansas Chapter, the American
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
Institute of Architects;
(4) One (1) person who is a licensed or registered mechanical
engineer experienced in public school mechanical and plumbing systems design
selected from a list of no fewer than three (3) names submitted by the
Arkansas Society of Professional Engineers;
(5) One (1) person who is a licensed or registered electrical
engineer experienced in public school electrical systems design selected from
a list of no fewer than three (3) names submitted by the Arkansas Society of
Professional Engineers;
(6) One (1) person who is a licensed or registered civil
engineer experienced in public school civil engineering design and
construction selected from a list of no fewer than three (3) names submitted
by the Arkansas Society of Professional Engineers;
(7) Two (2) persons selected by the Commission for Arkansas
Public School Academic Facilities and Transportation, one (1) of whom is
knowledgeable and holds certification in the field of educational technology
applications and strategies;
(8) Two (2) persons selected from a list of six (6) names
submitted by the Arkansas Association of Educational Administrators from its
membership;
(9) One (1) person selected from a list of three (3) names
submitted by the Arkansas Education Association from its membership;
(10) Two (2) persons selected from a list of six (6) names
submitted by the Arkansas School Boards Association from its membership;
(11) Two (2) persons selected from a list of six (6) names
submitted by the Arkansas Rural Ed Association from its membership;
(12) One (1) person selected from a list of three (3) names
submitted by the Arkansas Public School Resource Center, Inc., from its
membership; and
(13) Three (3) persons, one (1) from each of the professions of
construction, architecture, and education, selected by the commission to
serve as ex-officio members of the committee based on prior service on the
committee;
(9) One (1) licensed teacher appointed by the Commissioner of
Elementary and Secondary Education;
(10) One (1) principal appointed by the commissioner; and
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(11) One (1) superintendent appointed by the commissioner.

SECTION 32. Arkansas Code § 6-21-817(b), concerning the membership of
the Public School Americans with Disabilities Act Compliance Committee, is
amended to read as follows:
(b) The committee shall be composed of six (6) members as follows the
following members:
(1) One (1) member from the Building Authority Division;
(2) One (1) member from the Division of Public School Academic
Facilities and Transportation;
(3) One (1) member from the State Fire Marshal Office of the
Division of Arkansas State Police Office of Fire Protection Services;
(4) One (1) member from the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education;
(5) One (1) member from the Arkansas Association of Educational
Administrators; and
(6) One (1) member from the Arkansas Public School Resource
Center, Inc.
(5) Other relevant stakeholders deemed necessary by the members
designated under subdivisions (b)(1)-(4) of this section.

SECTION 33. Arkansas Code § 6-28-112(b), concerning academic course
placement under the Arkansas Military Child School Transitions Act of 2021,
is amended to read as follows:
(b) Academic course placement includes without limitation enrollment
in:
(1) Honors courses Accelerated learning courses; and
(2) The International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme;
(3) Advanced Placement courses; and
(4) Academic, technical, and career pathway courses.

SECTION 34. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 28, Subchapter 2, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
§ 6-28-207. Purple Star Schools.
(a) A public school district or an open-enrollment public charter
school that shows a significant commitment to serving students and families
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
connected to the United States Armed Forces may be designated as a Purple
Star School or Purple Star School District.
(b) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education may promulgate
rules to implement this section.

SECTION 35. Arkansas Code § 6-41-610(b)(2), concerning the membership
of the committee that develops and updates the Arkansas Dyslexia Resource
Guide, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) The committee shall include one (1) representative who
has the following members who shall have experience working in the field of
dyslexia intervention from the following organizations, and are appointed by
the Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education:
(i)(A) The Arkansas Association of Educational
Administrators One (1) public school administrator;
(ii)(B) The Division A representative from the Office of
Learning Services of the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education;
(iii)(C) The A representative from the Division of Higher
Education;
(iv)(D) The Arkansas Education Association One (1) public
school licensed educator;
(v)(E) The Arkansas School Boards Association One (1)
public school district board of directors member;
(vi)(F) The Arkansas School Psychology Association, A
school psychologist with at least three (3) years of experience in testing
for dyslexia; and
(vii)(G) An education service cooperative administrator.;
and
(B)(H) Three (3) professionals who have worked in a public
school who are knowledgeable in and have expertise in dyslexia screening and
interventions.

SECTION 36. Arkansas Code §§ 6-51-602 and 6-51-603 are amended to read
as follows:
6-51-602. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) “Admissions representative” means a person who executes an
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
enrollment agreement and who receives compensation for the primary duties of
encouraging prospective students to enroll for training in a program of study
offered by a school covered under the provisions of this subchapter;
(2) “Board” means the State Board of Private Career Education
Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board;
(3) “Combination school” means any school in which programs of
study are conducted by both distance education and resident training;
(4) “Director” means the authorized representative of the State
Board of Private Career Education for the purpose of administering the
provisions of this subchapter;
(5) “Distance education school” means any school in which all
programs of study are conducted by distance education;
(6) “Extension course site” means a location away from the
school where a course or courses are conducted one (1) or more times during
the licensure period;
(4) "Institution of higher education" means a:
(A) State-supported two-year or four-year college or
university; or
(B) Private, nonprofit two-year or four-year college or
university with its primary headquarters located in Arkansas that is eligible
to receive Title IV federal student aid funds;
(7)(5) “Program of study” means an organized unit of courses or
an individual course in which instruction is offered;
(8) “Resident school” means any school in which all programs of
study are conducted in resident classrooms or held in public meeting
facilities;
(9)(6) “Satellite school” means a location within the State of
school located in Arkansas but away from the school where programs of study
are offered on a regular continuing basis by Arkansas schools;
(10)(A)(7)(A) “School” means any person, firm, partnership,
association, corporation, or other form of business organization seeking to
do business or offering in the State of Arkansas an entity that offers:
(i) resident Resident or correspondence training that
leads to or enhances occupational qualifications.;
(B) “School” also means any firm, partnership,
association, corporation, or other form of business organization that offers
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
instruction
(ii) Instruction in airframe or power plant
mechanics.;
(C)(iii) “School” also means any firm, partnership,
association, corporation, or other form of business organization that offers
training Training as preparation for passing exams that may lead to
employment.; or
(D)(iv) “School” also means any firm, partnership,
association, corporation, or other form of business organization that offers
driver Driver education training, excluding those courses taught to motor
vehicle violators pursuant to court order.
(E)(B) “School” does not include:
(i) A program of instruction in yoga or in yoga-
teacher training; or
(ii) An an institution that is subject to the
jurisdiction of the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board under § 6-
61-301 of higher education; and
(11)(8) “Student” or “enrollee” means a person who is seeking to
enroll, has been enrolled, is sought for enrollment, or is seeking training
or instruction in a school as defined in this section.

6-51-603. Exemptions.
The following are exempt from licensure under this subchapter:
(1) Private institutions exclusively offering instruction at any
or all levels from preschool prekindergarten through twelfth grade twelve
(preK-12);
(2) Schools established by laws of Arkansas laws, governed by
Arkansas boards, and permitted to operate for the sole purpose of providing
specific training normally required to qualify persons for occupational
licensure by state boards or commissions, which determine education and other
standards for licensure and operation of such schools;
(3) State colleges and universities coordinated by the Arkansas
Higher Education Coordinating Board Institutions of higher education;
(4) Programs of study offered by institutions or individuals for
personal improvement, whether avocational or recreational, if designated
through media or other sources as not for the purpose of enhancing an
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
occupational objective;
(5) Schools operated solely to provide programs of study in
theology, divinity, religious education, and ministerial training;
(6) A training program offered or sponsored by an employer for
training and preparation of its own employees and for which no tuition fee is
charged the employee;
(7) A program of study sponsored by a recognized trade,
business, or professional organization for instruction of the members of the
organization with a closed membership and for which no fee is charged the
member;
(8) A school or educational institution supported by state or
local government taxation;
(9) Flight instructors and flight instruction schools licensed
under appropriate Federal Aviation Administration regulations and offering
only training for a private pilot's license;
(10) Schools covered by § 6-61-301(a)(3) and exempt from § 6-61-
101 et seq.;
(11) Training offered by other Arkansas state agencies, boards,
or commissions;
(12)(A) Training offered on military bases where a majority of
the students enrolled are active duty personnel or their adult family
members, United States Department of Defense civilian employees or their
adult family members, members of the United States Armed Forces reserve
components, and retirees.
(B) These organizations shall remain exempt from the
requirement for licensure if required to move off the military installation
for a period of not more than ninety (90) days because of a change in
security level which would not allow civilian students on the installation.
(C) The State Board of Private Career Division of Higher
Education shall have the authority to may review any situations that extend
past the ninety-day period and determine whether the exemption status should
remain for the school;
(13) Certified nurse aide or certified nursing assistant
training programs:
(A) Whose underlying majority ownership has ownership of
five (5) or more nursing facilities licensed by the Office of Long-Term Care;
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
and
(B) That are under the regulatory oversight of the office;
and
(14) Schools located outside the state that:
(A) Offer education or training outside the state; and
(B) Do not participate in distance education.

SECTION 37. Arkansas Code § 6-51-605 is amended to read as follows:
6-51-605. State Board of Private Career Education Authority of Division
of Higher Education.
(a)(1)(A) The Governor shall appoint a State Board of Private Career
Education of seven (7) members who shall serve for terms of seven (7) years.
(B) The Governor shall make appointments or reappointments
to the board to provide membership of three (3) persons associated with
schools and four (4) persons from the general public.
(2) The Commissioner of the Division of Higher Education and the
Director of the Division of Career and Technical Education or their designees
shall serve as nonvoting, ex officio members of the board.
(b)(1) The board may elect the necessary officers, acting by and
through the Commissioner of the Division of Higher Education.
(2) The Division of Higher Education shall have the sole
authority to:
(A)(1) Approve all schools offering programs of study
leading to or enhancing an occupational objective;
(B) Administer and enforce this subchapter; and
(C)(2) Issue licenses to schools that have met the
standards set forth for the purposes of this subchapter established by the
Division of Higher Education, including without limitation programs:
(A) Programs of study, adequate;
(B) Adequate facilities, financial;
(C) Financial stability, qualified;
(D) Qualified personnel, and legitimate; and
(E) Legitimate operating practices.
(c)(b) Upon approval by the Division of Higher Education, any such
school may issue certificates or diplomas.
(d)(c) The Division of Higher Education shall:
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(1) Formulate the Establish criteria and the standards evolved
for the approval of such licensed schools;
(2) Provide for adequate investigation of all schools applying
for a license;
(3) Issue licenses to those applicants meeting the standards
fixed established by the Division of Higher Education; and
(4) Maintain a list of schools approved under the provisions of
this subchapter.
(e) The Division of Higher Education shall formulate the standards
evolved under this subchapter for the approval of admissions representatives
of such licensed schools and issue licenses to those applicants meeting the
standards fixed by the Division of Higher Education.
(f)(d) In consultation with the board, the The Division of Higher
Education shall may promulgate standards and rules to be prescribed for the
administration of this subchapter and the management and operation of the
schools and admissions representatives, subject to the provisions of
implement this subchapter.
(g)(e) The Division of Higher Education shall participate in the
administer hearings before the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board
for provided to schools and admissions representatives in cases of facing
revocation or denial of licensure.
(h) Official meetings of the board may be called by the Chair of the
State Board of Private Career Education as necessary, but meetings shall be
held at least four (4) times a year.
(i) A majority of favorable votes by the board members at an official
meeting is required for adoption of a recommendation.
(j) Board members may be reimbursed for expenses in accordance with §
25-16-901 and stipends according to § 25-16-903.
(k) The board may adopt and use a seal, which may be used for the
authentication of the recommendations of the board.
(l)(1)(f)(1) The Division of Higher Education shall annually require
background investigations for all partners or shareholders with ten percent
(10%) or more ownership interest in a school when the school seeks an
original license.
(2) The Division of Higher Education may establish a schedule
for periodic background checks for partners or shareholders with ten percent
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(10%) or more ownership interest in a school when seeking renewal of a school
license.
(m)(1)(g)(1) The partners or shareholders shall apply to the
Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police for a state
and national criminal background check to be conducted by the Federal Bureau
of Investigation.
(2) The check shall conform to the applicable federal standards
and shall include the taking of fingerprints.
(3) The applicant shall sign a release of information to the
board and shall be responsible to the Division of Arkansas State Police for
the payment of any fee associated with the criminal background check.
(4) Upon completion of the criminal background check, the
Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall forward
to the Division of Higher Education all information obtained concerning the
person in the commission of any offense listed in § 6-51-606(g)(3).
(5)(A) The Division of Higher Education may issue a nonrenewable
temporary license pending the results of the criminal background check.
(B) The temporary license shall be valid for no more than
six (6) months.
(C) Upon receipt of information from the Identification
Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police that only one (1) of the
partners or shareholders of the school holding the license has been convicted
of any offense listed in § 6-51-606(g)(3), the Division of Higher Education
shall revoke the license.
(n)(1)(h)(1) The provisions of Licensure revocation under § 6-51-
606(g) may be waived by the Division of Higher Education upon the request of:
(A) An affected applicant for licensure; or
(B) The partners or shareholders of a school holding a
license subject to revocation.
(2) Circumstances for which a waiver may be granted shall
include, but not be limited to, without limitation the following:
(A) The age at which the crime was committed;
(B) The circumstances surrounding the crime;
(C) The length of time since the crime;
(D) Subsequent work history;
(E) Employment references;
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(F) Character references; and
(G) Other evidence demonstrating that the applicant does
not pose a threat.
(o)(1)(i)(1) Any information received by the Division of Higher
Education from the Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State
Police under this section shall not be available for examination except by:
(A) The affected applicant for licensure or his or her
authorized representative; or
(B) The person whose license is subject to revocation or
his or her authorized representative.
(2) No record, file, or document shall be removed from the
custody of the Division of Arkansas State Police.
(p)(j) Any information made available to the affected applicant for
licensure or the person whose license is subject to revocation shall be
information pertaining to that person only.
(q)(k) Rights of privilege and confidentiality established in this
section shall not extend to any document created for purposes other than the
background check required by this section.
(r) In consultation with the board, the Division of Higher Education
shall adopt the necessary rules to fully implement the provisions of this
section.

SECTION 38. Arkansas Code § 6-51-606 is amended to read as follows:
6-51-606. School license generally.
(a) No persons shall operate, conduct, maintain, or offer to operate
in this state Arkansas a school as defined in this subchapter, or solicit the
enrollment of students residing in the state Arkansas, unless a license is
first secured from the Division of Higher Education issued in accordance with
the provisions of this subchapter and the rules promulgated by the division
in consultation with the State Board of Private Career Education.
(b)(1) Application An application for a license shall be filed in the
manner and upon the forms prescribed and furnished by the division for that
purpose signed and include all required information as prescribed by the
division.
(2) The application shall be signed by the applicant and
properly verified and shall contain such information as may apply to the type
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
and kind of school, satellite school, or extension course site for which a
license is sought.
(c)(1) A license issued shall be restricted to the programs of study
specifically indicated in the application for a license.
(2) The holder of a license shall present a supplementary
application for approval of additional programs of study.
(d) The license shall remain the property of the State of Arkansas and
shall be returned to the division upon cause.
(e) After a license is issued to any school by the division on the
basis of its application, it shall be the responsibility of the school to
notify the division immediately the division of any changes in the ownership,
administration, location, faculty, or programs of study on the forms and in
the manner prescribed by the division.
(f)(1) In the event of the sale of such school, the license granted to
the original owner or operators shall not be transferable to the new
ownership or operators, but.
(2) An application for a new license must shall be made and
approved before the new ownership's taking over operation of the school.
(g) The division shall have the power to deny issuing a new or renewal
license, to revoke an existing license, or to place a licensee on probation,
if in its discretion it determines that:
(1) The licensee has violated any of the provisions of this
subchapter or any of the rules of the division;
(2) The applicant or licensee has knowingly presented to the
division incomplete or misleading information relating to licensure;
(3) The applicant or licensee has pleaded guilty, entered a plea
of nolo contendere, or has been found guilty in a criminal proceeding,
regardless of whether or not the adjudication of guilt or sentence is
withheld, deferred, or suspended by a court of this state Arkansas, another
state, or the United States Government, of:
(A) Any felony; or
(B) Any act involving moral turpitude, gross immorality,
or which is related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of a
licensee;
(4) The applicant or licensee has intentionally failed or
refused to permit the division or its representatives to inspect the school
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
or classes or has intentionally failed or refused to make available to the
division, at any time when requested to do so, full information pertaining to
any or all items of information contained in an application for license or
pertaining to the operation of the school;
(5) The applicant has failed or refused to submit to the
division an application for license or renewal in the manner and on the forms
prescribed;
(6) A licensed admissions representative has failed or refused
to display or produce his or her license when requested to do so by
prospective students or designated officials of the division;
(7) The applicant or licensee has failed to provide or maintain
premises, equipment, materials, supplies, or conditions in accordance with
minimum standards as established by rules;
(8) The licensee has been found by the division or a court of
law to have perpetrated fraud or deceit in advertising of the school or
programs of study or in presenting to prospective students information
relating to the school, programs of study, employment opportunities, or
opportunities for enrollment in institutions of higher education;
(9) The licensee has in its employ any admissions
representatives who have not been licensed but are actively engaged in the
practice of attempting to enroll students;
(10) The licensee has failed to provide and maintain standards
of instruction or qualified administrative, supervisory, or instructional
staff as established by rules;
(11) The applicant or licensee is unable to provide and maintain
financial resources in sufficient amount to equip and maintain the school or
classes;
(12) The licensee has moved the school into new premises or
facilities without first notifying the division;
(13) The licensee has offered training or instruction in
programs of study which have not been approved and authorized in accordance
with rules;
(14) A licensed admissions representative has solicited
prospective students to enroll in a school which has not been licensed by the
division or which is not listed on his or her license;
(15) There was a change in the ownership of the school without
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
proper notification to and approval from the division;
(16) The licensee has failed to notify the division or to
provide written documentation as to the cause that the license of a school
has been suspended or revoked or the school has been placed on probation or a
show cause issued in another state or by another regulatory agency;
(17) The licensee has failed to notify the division of legal
actions initiated by or against the school; or
(18) The licensee fails to make tuition refunds to the students
or their lenders in compliance with current rules.
(h) The division shall have the power to revoke a license if in its
discretion it determines that:
(1) The licensee has failed to cure a deficiency leading to a
license probation within the time as may be reasonably prescribed by the
division;
(2) The licensee while on probation has been found by the
division to have incurred an additional infraction of this subchapter; or
(3) The licensee has closed a school without first having
completed the training of all students currently enrolled or having made
tuition refunds to students or their lenders.
(i) The division may impose sanctions under § 25-15-217.
(j)(1) Unless directed to do so by court order, the division shall
not, for a period of five (5) years following revocation, reinstate the
license of a school or allow an owner of any such school to seek licensure of
another school.
(2) Upon expiration of licensure status, the school must apply
for an original license in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter.
(k)(1) Upon closure of a school located in Arkansas and licensed under
any provision of this subchapter, whether for license revocation or any other
cause, all student financial aid records for the previous three (3) years and
all student transcripts regardless of age must be delivered to the division.
(2) Delivered records shall be arranged in alphabetical order
and stored in boxes or in data format at the discretion of the division.
(3) The division shall be responsible for the proper security,
storage, and maintenance of all such records.

SECTION 39. Arkansas Code § 6-51-607(a)(1), concerning the payment of
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
annual fees by a private resident and correspondence school, is amended to
read as follows:
(a)(1) Each school licensed under this subchapter shall pay annually a
fee to be set by the Division of Higher Education in consultation with the
State Board of Private Career Education Arkansas Higher Education
Coordinating Board.

SECTION 40. Arkansas Code § 6-51-609(k), concerning the promulgation
of rules related to private resident and correspondence schools, is repealed.
(k) In consultation with the State Board of Private Career Education,
the Division of Higher Education shall adopt the necessary rules to fully
implement the provisions of this section.

SECTION 41. Arkansas Code § 6-51-610(a), concerning fees related to
private resident and correspondence schools, is amended to read as follows:
(a) In consultation with the State Board of Private Career Education
Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board, the Division of Higher
Education shall set fees for schools and admissions representatives.

SECTION 42. Arkansas Code § 6-51-616 is amended to read as follows:
6-51-616. Student grievance procedure.
(a) Any student may file a written complaint with the Division of
Higher Education on the forms prescribed and furnished by the division for
that purpose if the student has reason to believe he or she is suffering loss
or damage resulting from:
(1) The failure of a school to perform agreements made with the
student; or
(2) An admissions representative's misrepresentations in
enrolling the student.
(b)(1) All complaints shall be investigated, and attempts shall be
made to resolve them informally.
(2) If an informal resolution cannot be achieved, the aggrieved
party may request a formal hearing to be held before the State Board of
Private Career Education Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board.
(c) The aggrieved party may not pursue resolution before the board if
legal action has been filed.
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(d) The request for a hearing shall be in writing and filed with the
director division within one (1) year of completion of, or withdrawal from,
the school.
(e) The written request for a hearing shall name the parties involved
and specific facts giving rise to the dispute.
(f) The ruling of the board shall be binding upon the parties.

SECTION 43. The introductory language of Arkansas Code § 6-51-617(a),
concerning dispute resolution by the State Board of Private Career Education,
is amended to read as follows:
(a) The State Board of Private Career Education Arkansas Higher
Education Coordinating Board shall represent the sole authority to resolve
disputes between a student and a school as to grievances relating to:

SECTION 44. Arkansas Code § 6-51-621 is repealed.
6-51-621. Construction of subchapter.
Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to affect the
responsibilities of the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board as
defined in § 6-61-301.

SECTION 45. Arkansas Code § 6-51-622(d), concerning rules related to
noncommercial driver training instructions, is repealed.
(d)(1) In consultation with the State Board of Private Career
Education, the Division of Higher Education may promulgate reasonable rules
to implement, enforce, and administer this section.
(2) The rules of the division shall be issued in accordance with
the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

SECTION 46. Arkansas Code § 6-53-203(a), concerning powers and duties
of the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board related to the technical
and community college system, is amended to add an additional subdivision to
read as follows:
(10) Promulgate rules to implement this chapter.

SECTION 47. Arkansas Code § 6-60-1504 is amended to read as follows:
6-60-1504. Limitations.
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(a) Nothing in this subchapter shall be interpreted as:
(1) Giving a member of the campus community the right to disrupt
a previously scheduled or otherwise reserved activity;
(2) Authorizing a member of the campus community to disregard a
policy of the state-supported institution of higher education regarding:
(A) Compliance with state and federal laws on
discrimination and harassment; or
(B) The productive and efficient operation of an
instructional or work environment;
(3) Preventing a state-supported institution of higher education
from prohibiting, limiting, or restricting expression that is not protected
under the First Amendment to the United States Constitution or Article 2, §
6, of the Arkansas Constitution; or
(4) Prohibiting a state-supported institution of higher
education from imposing a restriction on the time, place, or manner of
expression in or on a campus forum, provided the restriction on the time,
place, or manner of expression:
(A) Is reasonable;
(B) Is justified without reference to the viewpoint of the
speaker;
(C) Is narrowly tailored to serve a significant state
interest; and
(D) Leaves open ample alternative channels for
communication of the information or message contained in the expression.
(b) A state-supported institution of higher education shall not grant
excused absences for:
(1) Purposes of political protest;
(2) Social or public policy advocacy; or
(3) Attempts to influence legislation or other governmental
policymaking at the local, state, or federal level.
(c) Academic standards, teaching standards, education standards,
curriculum, teacher professional development, and rules in a state-supported
institution of higher education shall not authorize student walkouts for
purposes of:
(1) Political protest;
(2) Social or public policy advocacy; or
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(3) Attempts to influence legislation or other governmental
policymaking at the local, state, or federal level.
(d) This section shall not be construed to prohibit students from
attending curricular or co-curricular activities approved by the state-
supported institution of higher education.
(e)(1) A student who negligently or intentionally causes damages to
the property of a state-supported institution of higher education while
engaging in a political protest or public policy advocacy shall be liable to
the state-supported institution of higher education for damages caused by the
student.
(2) A state-supported institution of higher education may seek
to recover damages described in subdivision (e)(1) of this section in a court
of competent jurisdiction.
(3) A student of a state-supported institution of higher
education who has been found liable for damages described in subdivision
(e)(1) of this section shall be subject to the following penalties until the
judgment is fully satisfied:
(A) The student shall be ineligible to receive a degree or
credential from the state-supported institution of higher education; and
(B) The state-supported institution of higher education
shall not transfer or otherwise endorse credit issued by the state-supported
institution of higher education for the purposes of satisfying degree
requirements at any other state-supported institution of higher education.

SECTION 48. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 60, is amended to add
additional subchapters to read as follows:
Subchapter 16 — Rejecting Discrimination and Indoctrination in Postsecondary
Education

6-60-1601. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly recognizes that:
(1) The First Amendment of the United States Constitution
robustly protects the right to speak without government interference, but not
to compel others to adopt, affirm, or adhere to specific beliefs;
(2) The Fourteenth Amendment of the United States Constitution
provides that no state shall deny to any person within its jurisdiction the
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
equal protection of the law;
(3) Title IV of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 promotes the
desegregation of public schools and authorizes the United States Attorney
General to file lawsuits to enforce the provisions of the Civil Rights Act of
1964. It defines "desegregation" as "the assignment of students to public
schools and within such schools without regard to their race, color,
religion, or national origin," thereby removing government-sanctioned racial
discrimination in schools and implementing the United States Supreme Court’s
holding in "Brown v. Board of Education", 347 U.S. 483 (1954), that racial
separation is a violation of the Equal Protection Clause of the Fourteenth
Amendment; and
(4) Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 states that “No
person in the United States shall, on the ground of race, color, or national
origin, be excluded from participation in, be denied the benefits of, or be
subjected to discrimination under any program or activity receiving Federal
financial assistance".

6-60-1602. Purpose.
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly that administrators,
faculty, and other employees of a state-supported institution of higher
education maintain nondiscriminatory policies in accordance with Title IV,
Title VI, and Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964.
(b) This subchapter is enacted to:
(1) Prevent discrimination;
(2) Promote the intellectual development of students and faculty
in Arkansas; and
(3) Protect the free exchange of ideas according to the United
States Constitution and the Arkansas Constitution.

6-60-1603. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Accreditation” means the status of public recognition that
an accrediting agency grants to an educational institution;
(2) “Accrediting agency” means a legal entity or part of a legal
entity that:
(A) Conducts accrediting activities; and
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(B) Makes decisions about the accreditation or pre-
accreditation status of educational institutions;
(3) “Affirm, adopt, or adhere to” includes communicative speech
or act or action, including without limitation:
(A) Engaging in symbolic speech;
(B) Holding signs;
(C) Raising hands;
(D) Signing a pledge; or
(E) Participating in a parade, “privilege walk”, or
racially segregated activity of any sort;
(4) “Compel” means:
(A) Causing or pressuring an individual to perform an act
or action against his or her will; or
(B) Retaliating against an individual who declines to
perform an act against his or her will;
(5) “Diversity, equity, and inclusion initiative” or “DEI”
means:
(A) An office, division, department, or administrative
provider of a unit of study at a state-supported institution of higher
education with the purpose of:
(i) Influencing academic, administrative, hiring, or
employment practices at the state-supported institution of higher education;
(ii) Promoting:
(a) Preferences based upon race, color, sex,
ethnicity, or national origin;
(b) Differential treatment on the basis of
race, color, sex, ethnicity, or national origin; or
(c) Political or social activism to consider
race, color, sex, ethnicity, or national origin as factors in decision-
making, except where required by federal or state law; or
(iii) Any promotion described in subdivision
(5)(A)(ii) of this section that conflicts with state and federal
antidiscrimination laws; or
(B) Any program, activity, applicant statement, or
training described in § 6-60-1604 that promotes an activity described in
subdivision (5)(A)(ii) of this section;
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(6) “State-supported institution of higher education” means a
public postsecondary institution or a department in a public postsecondary
institution that:
(A) Provides:
(i) An eligible program of training to prepare
students for gainful employment in a recognized occupation; or
(ii) A program leading to a baccalaureate degree or
a graduate degree; and
(B) Is accredited by a recognized accrediting agency or
association and has continuously held the accreditation for the number of
years required by the Division of Higher Education; and
(7) "Unit of study" means a class, single component, or subject
offered by a state-supported institution of higher education for the
completion of a degree or that leads to a postsecondary award, including
academic credit, or for the purposes of auditing a class.

6-60-1604. Prohibitions.
(a) An officer, agent, administrator, employee, teacher, or contractor
of a state-supported institution of higher education shall not compel another
officer, agent, administrator, employee, teacher, contractor, or student of
the state-supported institution of higher education to personally affirm,
adopt, or adhere to ideas or beliefs in violation of Title IV, Title VI, or
Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, including without limitation:
(1) That an individual should be adversely or advantageously
treated on the basis of his or her race, ethnicity, sex, color, or national
origin; and
(2) That an individual student of a state-supported institution
of higher education or group of students of a state-supported institution of
higher education, by virtue of their race, ethnicity, sex, color, or national
origin, bear collective guilt or are inherently responsible for actions
committed by other members of the same race, ethnicity, sex, color, or
national origin.
(b) An officer, agent, administrator, employee, teacher, or contractor
of a state-supported institution of higher education shall not adversely or
advantageously treat students of the state-supported institution of higher
education differently on the basis of race, ethnicity, sex, color, or
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
national origin except to the extent otherwise allowed by federal law.
(c)(1) An officer, agent, administrator, employee, teacher, or
contractor of a state-supported institution of higher education, when acting
in the course of his or her official duties, shall not organize, participate
in, or carry out any act or communication that would violate subsection (a)
of this section.
(2) The prohibition under subdivision (c)(1) of this section
shall not be construed to prohibit an employee of a state-supported
institution of higher education from:
(A) Discussing the ideas and history of the concepts
described in subsection (a) of this section for legitimate educational,
andragogical, or pedagogical purposes consistent with this subchapter; and
(B) Using methods of communication not in violation of
this subchapter.
(d) An officer, agent, administrator, employee, teacher, or contractor
of a state-supported institution of higher education may not condition
enrollment in or attendance of a class, training, or orientation of the
state-supported institution of higher education:
(1) On the basis of race, ethnicity, sex, color, or national
origin where not required by federal law; or
(2) On requiring an individual to personally affirm, adopt, or
adhere to a political, philosophical, religious, or other ideological
viewpoint.
(e) An officer, agent, administrator, employee, teacher, or contractor
of a state-supported institution of higher education shall not compel another
officer, agent, administrator, employee, teacher, contractor, or student of
the state-supported institution of higher education to personally affirm,
adopt, or adhere to a political, philosophical, religious, or other
ideological viewpoint.
(f) A state-supported institution of higher education shall not:
(1) Collect and report information related to DEI for
institutional accreditation purposes;
(2) Comply with any institutional accreditation requirement
related to DEI, including without limitation the requirement of a diversity
statement from a state-supported institution of higher education or any
employee or contractor of a state-supported institution of higher education;
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
or
(3) Comply with any institutional accreditation requirement of
an accrediting agency that would require the state-supported institution of
higher education to violate this subchapter.
(g)(1) This subchapter does not prohibit officers, agents,
administrators, employees, teachers, contractors, or students of a state-
supported institution of higher education from discussing public policy
issues or ideas that individuals may find unwelcome, disagreeable, or
offensive.
(2) It is the policy of this state that a state-supported
institution of higher education educates students of the state-supported
institution of higher education on how to think and not what to think.
(h)(1) Upon the president or chancellor of a state-supported
institution of higher education receiving notice from the Attorney General of
a violation of this section, a state-supported institution of higher
education that does not immediately make all reasonable efforts to resolve
the violation of this section shall demonstrate compliance with all
requirements of this section within a reasonable time.
(2)(A) A state-supported institution of higher education that
fails to demonstrate compliance with all requirements of this section within
a reasonable time as required under subdivision (h)(1) of this section shall
not be eligible for state funding under the state higher education funding
formula.
(B) In order to regain eligibility for receipt of state
funding, a state-supported institution of higher education shall demonstrate
compliance with all requirements of this section for not less than one (1)
fiscal year after the fiscal year in which the state-supported institution of
higher education became ineligible for receipt of state funding.
(i) A state-supported institution of higher education shall not expend
any state funds and shall reject any federal funds whose receipt requires the
state-supported institution of higher education to violate this subchapter.
(j) This subchapter shall not be construed to prevent compliance with
any state or federal civil rights laws that do not depend on receipt of state
or federal funding.
(k) A state-supported institution of higher education shall not
require a current or prospective officer, agent, administrator, employee,
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
teacher, contractor, or student of the state-supported institution of higher
education to submit a statement or diversity statement describing his or her
views on matters related to race, ethnicity, sex, color, or national origin
to be considered for the purposes of hiring, evaluating, admitting, or
promoting the officer, agent, administrator, employee, teacher, contractor,
or student of the state-supported institution of higher education.
(l) This subchapter does not prohibit a state-supported institution of
higher education from directing recruitment, advertisement, or promotion
efforts to a specific population of prospective or existing students.
(m) This subchapter may be enforced by the Attorney General on behalf
of the state.

Subchapter 17 — Arkansas Direct Admissions Program

6-60-1701 Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Direct
Admissions Program Act”.

6-60-1702. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Application requirements” means the forms, payments, or
activities that are required to be completed by a student to apply to a
state-supported institution of higher education as set by each participating
institution;
(2) “Eligible student” means a student who resides in Arkansas
and attends a public or private accredited high school that has agreed to
participate in the Arkansas Direct Admissions Program;
(3) “Enrollment requirements” means the forms, payments, or
activities that are required to be completed by a student to enroll in a
state-supported institution of higher education as set by each participating
institution;
(4) “Participating institution” means a state-supported
institution of higher education, community college, or technical college
within Arkansas that uses the Arkansas Direct Admissions Program;
(5) “Participating public school” means:
(A) A public high school within a traditional public
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
school district that is accredited by the State Board of Education;
(B) An open-enrollment public charter school organized as
a high school that is authorized by the charter authorizing panel; and
(C) A private high school that is accredited by:
(i) The Arkansas Nonpublic School Accrediting
Association, Inc., or its successor; or
(ii) Another accrediting association recognized by
the state board;
(6) “Provisional admissions criteria” means the minimum academic
requirements that a student is required to meet to receive a provisional
admissions offer from a participating institution; and
(7)(A) “Provisional admissions offer” means a determination that
a student meets admissions criteria.
(B) "Provisional admissions offer" does not mean
acceptance to a participating institution.

§ 6-60-1703. Arkansas Direct Admissions Program.
(a) There is established the Arkansas Direct Admissions Program.
(b) The program shall:
(1) Begin implementation with the high school graduating class
of 2026-2027;
(2) Establish:
(A) Provisional admissions criteria, including without
limitation:
(i) Grade point average;
(ii) Assessment scores; and
(iii) Course completion;
(B) Eligibility requirements for participating
institutions that include without limitation:
(i) Application requirements; and
(ii) Enrollment requirements; and
(C) Eligibility requirements for participating public
schools;
(3) Require the collection of student academic information to
determine provisional admissions offers;
(4) Include a common application portal for eligible students to
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
participate in the program that may include without limitation:
(A) Information about participating institutions;
(B) Communication of provisional admissions offers to
participating students; and
(C) Information about available financial aid; and
(5) Include a plan to conduct outreach to eligible students to
provide the eligible students with information regarding the operation of the
program.
(c) This section shall not prevent a student who does not qualify for
a provisional admissions offer from applying for enrollment in a
participating institution through the participating institution's existing
admissions process.
(d) The Division of Higher Education may promulgate rules to implement
this subchapter.

§ 6-60-1704. Duties of public school districts and open-enrollment
public charter schools.
(a) A public school district or open-enrollment public charter school
may opt to participate in the Arkansas Direct Admissions Program.
(b) A participating public school shall provide student data to the
Division of Higher Education that includes without limitation:
(1) Grade point average;
(2) Assessment scores; and
(3) Course completion.
(c)(1) Each public school district and open-enrollment public charter
school shall inform all students about participation in the Arkansas Direct
Admissions Program.
(2) A public school district or open-enrollment public charter
school shall not actively discourage or prohibit an eligible student from
participating in the Arkansas Direct Admissions Program.

SECTION 49. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 61, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
§ 6-61-144. Purple Star Campuses.
(a) A state-supported institution of higher education that shows a
significant commitment to serving students and families connected to the
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
United States Armed Forces may be designated as a Purple Star Campus.
(b) The Division of Higher Education may promulgate rules to implement
this section.

SECTION 50. Arkansas Code § 6-61-201(a)-(c), concerning membership of
the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board, are amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1) The Beginning May 1, 2025, the Arkansas Higher Education
Coordinating Board shall consist of twelve (12) seven (7) members appointed
by the Governor as follows:
(A)(i) Six (6) Four (4) members who shall be:
(a) Qualified electors of the State of
Arkansas; and
(b) Graduates of public two-year or four-year
state-supported institutions of higher education within the state.
(ii) If an appointee under this subdivision (a)(1)(A)
is serving as a member of a board of a two-year or four-year state-supported
institution of higher education at the time of appointment to the Arkansas
Higher Education Coordinating Board, the appointee shall relinquish his or
her membership on the board of the two-year or four-year state-supported
institution of higher education; and
(B)(i) Six (6) Three (3) members shall be selected from
business, industry, education, agriculturally related industry, and medical
services and shall not be current members of a board of a public two-year or
four-year state-supported institution of higher education.
(ii) At least one (1) of the appointees shall have a
strong interest in and commitment to economic and workforce development.
(iii) At least one (1) of the appointees shall have
experience in the knowledge-based technology field.
(2) No more than four (4) two (2) members of the Arkansas Higher
Education Coordinating Board shall be appointed from any one (1)
congressional district as the districts exist at the time of the appointment.
(b) Vacancies on the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board
shall be filled for the unexpired terms, and the appointments shall be made
in the same manner as the positions vacated.
(c)(1) The members of the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
shall serve staggered terms of six (6) years.
(2) The terms of two (2) members shall expire each year.

SECTION 51. Arkansas Code § 6-61-202(a), concerning powers and duties
of the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board, is amended to add
additional subdivisions to read as follows:
(8) Perform all other functions that may now or hereafter be
delegated to the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board by law; and
(9) Promulgate rules to perform all duties and obligations to
implement this subchapter.

SECTION 52. Arkansas Code § 6-61-231(b)(1), concerning the purpose of
the statewide transfer agreement, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) The purpose of this section is to eliminate obstacles to
transfers of credits among public state-supported institutions of higher
education in Arkansas by providing a seamless transfer of academic credits
from a completed designated transfer degree program or a completed state
minimum core curriculum to a baccalaureate degree program without the loss of
earned credits and without the receiving public state-supported institution
of higher education requiring additional lower-division general education
credits.

SECTION 53. Arkansas Code § 6-61-231(c), concerning the statewide
transfer agreement developed by the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating
Board, is amended to add an additional subdivision read as follows:
(6)(A) Provides for a reverse transfer agreement for a student
seeking an associate degree that transfers to a four-year state-supported
institution of higher education before earning an associate degree.
(B)(i) Except as provided in subsection (c)(6)(B)(ii), a
student shall be awarded an associate degree by the two-year state-supported
institution of higher education upon completing the degree requirements at
the four-year state-supported institution of higher education if the student
earned more than thirty (30) credit hours toward the associate degree at the
two-year state-supported institution of higher education.
(ii) A student eligible to receive an associate
degree under subdivision (c)(6)(B)(i) of this section shall be:
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(a) Notified in writing by the state-supported
institution of higher education awarding the associate degree that the
student is eligible to receive an associate degree;
(b) Provided an opportunity to decline the
award of the associate degree;
(c) Awarded the associate degree if the
student takes no action within thirty (30) days of being provided notice
under subdivision (c)(6)(B)(ii)(a) of this section; and
(d) Awarded the associate degree by the four-
year state-supported institution of higher education if the student elects to
be awarded the associate degree by the four-year state-supported institution
of higher education upon completion of the degree requirements.
(C)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (c)(6)(B)(ii)(d),
a four-year state-supported institution of higher education shall:
(a) Identify each student who has completed at
least sixty (60) hours of academic credit and met the state core curriculum
requirements; and
(b) Forward a copy of the student's transcript
to the two-year state-supported institution of higher education.
(ii) If a student attended more than one (1) two-
year state-supported institution of higher education, the student's
transcript shall be sent to the two-year state-supported institution of
higher education that provided the largest number of credit hours.
(iii) The two-year state-supported institution of
higher education shall notify the four-year state-supported institution of
higher education if the associate degree has been conferred.
(iv) Upon notification, the four-year state-
supported institution of higher education is no longer required to forward
subsequent transcripts of the student at the completion of each term.

SECTION 54. Arkansas Code § 6-61-231(d)(2)(B), concerning the
requirement of the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board related to
the statewide transfer agreement to identify postsecondary career education
programs offered by two-year public institutions of higher education is
amended to read as follows:
(B) Postsecondary career and technical education programs
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
offered by two-year public state-supported institutions of higher education,
including those designated as college-credit courses applicable toward a
certificate or degree;

SECTION 55. Arkansas Code § 6-61-234 is amended to read as follows:
6-61-234. Productivity-based funding model.
(a)(1)(A) The Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall adopt
policies developed by the Division of Higher Education may promulgate rules
necessary to implement a productivity-based funding model for state-supported
institutions of higher education, including without limitation two-year and
four-year state-supported institutions of higher education.
(B) The board shall adopt separate policies for two-year
institutions of higher education and four-year institutions of higher
education.
(2) The policies rules adopted to implement a productivity-based
funding model for state-supported institutions of higher education shall
contain measures for effectiveness, affordability, and efficiency that
acknowledge the following priorities:
(A) Differences in institutional missions;
(B) Completion of students' educational goals;
(C) Progression toward students' completion of programs of
study;
(D) Affordability through:
(i) On-time completion of programs of study;
(ii) Limiting the number of excess credits earned by
students; and
(iii) Efficient allocation of resources;
(E)(i) Beginning in the 2026-2027 academic year,
incorporation of a return on investment metric into the productivity-based
funding model.
(ii) The return on investment metric under
subdivision (a)(2)(E)(i) of this section shall be defined by rule of the
Division of Higher Education.
(iii) The Division of Higher Education shall ensure
that the return on investment metric required under subdivision (a)(2)(E)(i)
of this section is aligned with state economic and workforce needs;
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(E)(F) Institutional collaboration that encourages the
successful transfer of students;
(F)(G) Success in serving underrepresented students; and
(G)(H) Production of students graduating with credentials
in science, technology, engineering, mathematics, and high-demand fields that
align with statewide and regional workforce needs.
(3)(A) The Division of Higher Education may promulgate rules to
implement a funding formula to support noncredit programs at a state-
supported institution of higher education.
(B) Funding for a noncredit program may come from the
following:
(i) General revenues authorized by law; and
(ii) Any other funds as provided by law.
(C) The Division of Higher Education shall consult with the Governor's
Workforce Cabinet during development of the funding formula for the noncredit
programs under subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this section.
(3)(4) The productivity-based funding model shall not determine
the funding needs of special units such as a medical school, a division of
agriculture, or system offices.
(b) The productivity-based funding model shall be:
(1) Used to align institutional funding with statewide
priorities for higher education by:
(A) Encouraging programs and services focused on student
success; and
(B) Providing incentives for progress toward statewide
goals; and
(2) Built around a set of shared principles that:
(A) Are embraced by state-supported institutions of higher
education;
(B) Employ appropriate productivity metrics; and
(C) Are aligned with goals and objectives for
postsecondary education attainment in this state.
(c)(1) The board Division of Higher Education shall use the
productivity-based funding model as the mechanism for recommending funding
for state-supported institutions of higher education.
(2) The board Division of Higher Education shall recommend
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
funding for:
(A) State-supported institutions of higher education as a
whole; and
(B) The allocation of funding to each state-supported
institution of higher education.
(3) The board Division of Higher Education shall may make
separate recommendations for:
(A) two-year Two-year state-supported institutions of
higher education; and
(B) four-year Four-year state-supported institutions of
higher education.
(d) Funds unallocated to state-supported institutions of higher
education due to productivity declines shall be reserved by the division
Division of Higher Education to address statewide needs in higher education.
(e) The division Division of Higher Education shall review the
policies every five (5) years to ensure the productivity-based funding model
continues to respond to the needs and priorities of the state.
(f) In any fiscal year for which the aggregate general revenue funding
forecast to be available for state-supported institutions of higher education
is greater than two percent (2%) less than the amount provided for the
immediate previous fiscal year, the division shall not further implement the
productivity-based funding model until the following fiscal year.

SECTION 56. Arkansas Code § 6-61-1010, concerning authority of the
Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board under the Technical College and
Community College Capital Improvement Act of 1993, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(f) The Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board may promulgate
rules to implement this subchapter.

SECTION 57. Arkansas Code § 6-61-1402 is amended to read as follows:
6-61-1402. Courses included in common course numbering system.
(a)(1) The Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board, in
collaboration with all state-supported institutions of higher education,
shall develop and approve a statewide common course numbering system for
lower-division general education courses found within the Arkansas Course
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
Transfer System.
(2)(b) A state-supported institution of higher education that is
not in full compliance with this subchapter shall not be eligible to accept
state aid from the Higher Education Grants Fund Account on behalf of a
student.
(b)(1) A course designated as an upper-division course level may be
offered by any four-year state-supported institution of higher education and
shall be characterized by a need for advanced academic preparation and skills
that a student would be unlikely to achieve without significant prior
coursework.
(2) Upper-division courses are not required to be included in
the common course numbering system.
(c) A course designated as a lower-division course level may be
offered by any state-supported institution of higher education.
(d) The common course numbering system shall include the thirty-five-
hour general education core and major program prerequisites that are included
in the state minimum core curriculum under § 6-61-231.

SECTION 58. Arkansas Code § 6-61-1403 is amended to read as follows:
6-61-1403. Additions or alterations.
(a) The Commissioner of the Division of Higher Education shall
recommend to the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board any additions
or alterations to the common course numbering system.
(b) The board, with input from the Presidents Council, shall consider
the recommended additions and alterations to the common course numbering
system.
(c) The board may adopt or refuse to adopt suggested additions or
alterations to the common course numbering system.
Beginning with the 2026-2027 academic year, the Division of Higher
Education, in collaboration with the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education, shall:
(1) Make recommendations for additions and alterations to the
common course numbering system; and
(2) Review the common course numbering system to begin aligning
elementary and secondary courses.

03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
SECTION 59. Arkansas Code § 6-61-1406 is amended to read as follows:
6-61-1406. Courses review.
(a) The Division of Higher Education, in consultation with the
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education, shall:
(1) Regularly schedule reviews of courses that are listed in the
common course numbering system; and
(2) Establish review procedures; and
(3) Adopt policies to carry out this section.
(b) The Division of Higher Education, in collaboration with the
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education, may promulgate rules to
implement this subchapter.

SECTION 60. Arkansas Code § 6-63-104 is amended to read as follows:
6-63-104. Faculty performance review.
(a)(1) The president and chancellor of each state-supported
institution of higher education in Arkansas shall work with the campus
faculties to develop a framework to review faculty performance, including
post-tenure review.
(2)(A) The framework should be used to develop processes and
procedures at each state-supported institution to ensure a consistently high
level of performance of the faculty at Arkansas's publicly supported
institutions a state-supported institution of higher education.
(B) The effects of the review process of faculty
performance should include rewarding productive faculty, redirecting faculty
efforts to improve or to increase productivity, and correcting instances of
substandard performance.
(C) The framework developed by each state-supported
institution shall be reported to the House Committee on Education, the Senate
Committee on Education, the Joint Interim Oversight Committee on Education
Reform, and the Division of Higher Education no later than December 1, 1998
2025, and shall be implemented on the respective campuses no later than
January 1, 2001 2026.
(b)(1) Pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, each state-
supported institution of higher education in Arkansas shall conduct a
rigorous, consistently applied, annual review of the performance of all full-
time faculty members.
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(2) This review shall include assessments by peers, students,
and administrators and shall be utilized to ensure a consistently high level
of performance and serve in conjunction with other appropriate information as
a basis for decisions on promotion, salary increases, and job tenure. The
evaluation by students and administrative staff, shall be applicable to all
teaching faculty, full-time, part-time, and graduate teaching assistants and
shall include an assessment of the fluency in English of the faculty member
or graduate teaching assistant. This review shall not be used to demote a
tenured faculty member to a nontenured status.
(3) The review process may result in the following corrective
actions:
(A) Remedial training;
(B) Removal of tenure status; or
(C) Any other action permitted by the state-supported
institution of higher education’s review policy.
(4)(A) A state-supported institution of higher education may
require an immediate for cause review of a faculty member as described in
subsection (f) of this section.
(B) A tenured faculty member may appeal a state-supported
institution of higher education’s performance review decision in accordance
with the provisions set by the state-supported institution of higher
education in its faculty performance review framework.
(C) A state-supported institution of higher education
shall provide a tenured faculty member with appropriate due process.
(c)(1) Each college and university state-supported institution of
higher education shall continually make efforts to identify any English
fluency deficiencies of the teaching faculty and shall take reasonable
measures to assist deficient faculty members in becoming proficient in
English; however, the responsibility of acquiring the level of English
proficiency required for the faculty member's teaching, research, or service
assignments rests with the faculty member.
(2) Each college and university state-supported institution of
higher education shall have a process for addressing concerns raised by
students concerning language proficiency problems of faculty members.
(d)(1) The division A state-supported institution of higher education
shall be responsible for monitoring the evaluation performance review process
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
and shall report its findings to the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating
Board and to the Legislative Council by August 1 of each year of all faculty
members.
(2) The state-supported institution of higher education shall
report by August 1 each year to its governing board the number of:
(A) Tenure track positions;
(B) Faculty members with current tenure status;
(C) Faculty members that initially received tenure status;
(D) Faculty members with tenure status in which tenure was
reviewed that year; and
(E) Faculty members whose tenure status was:
(i) Maintained;
(ii) Conditionally maintained; and
(iii) Revoked.
(3) A copy of the report under subdivision (d)(2) of this
section shall be provided to the division and the Legislative Council.
(e) Each state-supported institution of higher education shall require
full-time faculty members of the college of education and related disciplines
to work collaboratively with the accredited public schools in this state, and
such faculty involvement shall be included as part of the annual review of
the faculty as required by subsection (b) of this section.
(f) A state-supported institution of higher education may require an
immediate review of a faculty member, including a faculty member with tenure,
at any time if the state-supported institution of higher education determines
that the faculty member has:
(1) Exhibited professional incompetence in the performance of
his or her mandatory job duties;
(2) Continually or repeatedly failed to perform duties or meet
professional responsibilities of the faculty member's position;
(3) Failed to successfully complete any post-tenure review
professional development program;
(4) Violated laws or policies of a university system or a state-
supported institution of higher education that are substantially related to
the performance of the faculty member's duties;
(5) Been convicted of a crime affecting the fitness of the
faculty member to engage in teaching, research, service, outreach, or
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
administration;
(6) Engaged in unprofessional conduct that adversely affects the
state-supported institution of higher education or the faculty member's
performance of duties or meeting of responsibilities;
(7) Falsified the faculty member's academic credentials; or
(8) Met any other for cause justification as defined in the
state-supported institution of higher education's review policy.
(g) This section shall not affect the ability of a state-supported
institution of higher education to terminate or take other action against a
nontenured or at-will faculty member in accordance with the policies of the
state-supported institution of higher education.
SECTION 61. Arkansas Code § 6-80-105 is amended to read as follows:
6-80-105. Student financial aid — Scholarship stacking — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Cost of attendance” means the recognized cost of attendance
of an institution of higher education calculated under rules established by
the Division of Higher Education amount reported as the cost of attendance by
an institution of higher education to the Division of Higher Education
through the Integrated Postsecondary Education Data System;
(2) “Federal aid” means scholarships or grants awarded to a
student as a result of the Free Application for Federal Student Aid,
excluding the Pell Grant;
(3) “Other aid” means a scholarship, grant, waiver, or
reimbursement for tuition, fees, books, or other cost of attendance, other
than federal aid or state aid, provided to a student from a postsecondary
institution or a private source;
(4) “State aid” means scholarships or grants awarded to a
student from public funds, including without limitation the Arkansas Academic
Challenge Scholarship under § 6-85-201 et seq., the Division of Higher
Education division's scholarship and grant programs, state general revenues,
tuition, and local tax revenue; and
(5)(A) “Student aid package” means federal aid, state aid, and
other aid a student receives for postsecondary education expenses.
(B) “Student aid package” does not include federal aid,
state aid, or other aid received by a student who is:
(i) An active member of the United States Armed
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
Forces;
(ii) An active member of the National Guard;
(iii) A member of the reserve components of the
armed forces; or
(iv) The spouse of a person under subdivision
(a)(5)(B)(i), subdivision (a)(5)(B)(ii), or subdivision (a)(5)(B)(iii) of
this section.
(b)(1) The federal cost of attendance method shall be used for all
students receiving state aid, regardless of whether a student is receiving
federal aid.
(2)(A) Costs that would not be included in the federal cost of
attendance shall not be included in the package for a student who receives
state aid.
(B) Exceptions to the normal federal cost of attendance
allowances as set forth in federal regulations may be included in the cost of
attendance calculations.
(C) Institutional work study is not included in cost of
attendance unless the institutional work study is need-based.
(3) A postsecondary institution shall not award state aid in a
student aid package in excess of the cost of attendance at the institution
where the student enrolls.
(2) For the purpose of stacking scholarships in a student's
student aid package, the Arkansas Academic Challenge Scholarship under § 6-
85-201 et seq. shall be reduced or returned first.
(4) A two-year private postsecondary institution of higher
education shall not award state aid in a student aid package at a cost
greater than any two-year state-supported institution of higher education.
(5) A four-year private postsecondary institution of higher
education shall not award state aid in a student aid package at a cost
greater than any four-year state-supported institution of higher education.
(6) An institution of higher education shall award aid in the
following order:
(A) The Arkansas Academic Challenge Scholarship;
(B) Any other state scholarship program, excluding the
Arkansas Future Grant Program, Arkansas Teacher Academy Scholarship Program,
and Arkansas National Guard Tuition Waiver Program;
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(C) The Arkansas Future Grant Program, Arkansas Teacher
Academy Scholarship Program, or Arkansas National Guard Tuition Waiver
Program; and
(D) Institutional aid.
(c) A postsecondary institution shall report to the division, no later
than September 30 of each year, the total amount of federal aid, state aid,
and other aid a student receives if the student receives an award from a
division scholarship or grant program, including the Arkansas Academic
Challenge Scholarship under § 6-85-201 et seq.
(d)(1) When a student receives a student aid package that includes
state aid and the student aid package exceeds the cost of attendance, the
postsecondary institution shall repay state aid in the amount exceeding the
cost of attendance, starting with state aid received under the Arkansas
Academic Challenge Scholarship under § 6-85-201 et seq utilizing the stacking
order under subdivision (b)(6) of this section.
(2) The division shall credit the excess state aid funds to the
appropriate division fund or trust account.
(e) A student awarded state aid shall disclose all state aid, federal
aid, and other aid to:
(1) The division if the division awards state aid to the
student; and
(2) A postsecondary institution that awards state aid or other
aid to the student.
(f) Except as otherwise provided by federal law, federal aid will be
applied before state aid governed by this section.

SECTION 62. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 80, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-80-110. Utilization of the Classic Learning Test.
(a) A state-supported institution of higher education shall accept the
Classic Learning Test (CLT) examination to the same extent the state-
supported institution of higher education accepts the ACT test and the SAT
test.
(b)(1) Subsection (a) of this section shall apply to admissions
criteria and eligibility criteria for state-funded financial assistance
programs.
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(2) Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to
institutional assistance programs.

SECTION 63. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 80, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 2 — Residency Classification for State-funded Scholarships at
State-Supported Institutions of Higher Education

6-80-201. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Residency
Classification for State-funded Scholarships at State-Supported Institutions
of Higher Education”.

6-80-202. Residency classification for state-funded scholarships
administered by Division of Higher Education.
(a)(1) In making decisions about the residency classification or
reclassification of a student for state-funded scholarship purposes, unless
otherwise specified by statute, a student shall be classified as an in-state
resident for state-funded scholarship purposes only if the student:
(A) Will graduate or has graduated from an Arkansas public
school, private school, or home school within nine (9) months of enrolling in
the state-supported institution of higher education; or
(B) Established legal residency in Arkansas by:
(i) Meeting the requirements of rules promulgated by the
Division of Higher Education; and
(ii) Being physically present in Arkansas for at least six
(6) continuous months with the intent to remain in Arkansas.
(2) Mere physical presence in Arkansas is not sufficient to
establish residency or demonstrate future intent under subdivision (a)(1)(B)
of this section.
(3) A student who claims in-state residency for purposes of
state-funded scholarship eligibility but receives Free Application for
Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) verification that he or she is not an in-state
resident shall have his or her state-funded scholarship amount reduced or
rescinded to reflect the change in residency status.
(b) A member of the United States Armed Forces who is stationed in
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
Arkansas under military orders, along with his or her dependents, is entitled
to classification as an in-state resident for state-funded scholarship
purposes.

6-80-203. Duties and responsibilities of students.
(a)(1) It is the responsibility of each student, at the time of
registration, to seek the proper residency classification for state-funded
scholarship purposes.
(2) A participating state-supported institution of higher
education shall have a process for a student to appeal a residency
classification for state-funded scholarship purposes.
(b)(1) A student who knowingly gives false information to establish
residency classification for state-funded scholarship purposes shall be
subject to dismissal by the state-supported institution of higher education.
(2) An initial classification as an out-of-state student shall
not limit the right of a student to be reclassified later as a resident of
Arkansas for state-funded scholarship purposes provided that the student can
establish proof of legal residence in Arkansas.

SECTION 64. Arkansas Code § 6-81-604(6), concerning the grade point
average required for grant recipients under the Teacher Opportunity Program,
is amended to read as follows:
(6) Grant recipients shall maintain a cumulative grade point
average in their college work of no less than 2.5 on a 4.0 scale or maintain
an appropriate equivalent as determined by the Division of Higher Education.

SECTION 65. Arkansas Code § 6-81-605 is amended to read as follows:
6-81-605. Grants — Priority.
(a)(1) The first priority for the award of funds under the Teacher
Opportunity Program is the award of reimbursements for additional education
in:
(A) Science, technology, engineering, or mathematics
fields;
(B) Computer science;
(C) Literacy or reading;
(D) Prekindergarten education; or
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(E) Special education.
(2) If funds are available after all awards are made under
subdivision (a)(1) of this section, then additional reimbursements awards may
be made in accordance with the following:
(A)(i) A teacher may receive an award if seeking dual
licensure in an additional subject area different from the subject area in
which the teacher is currently teaching, if he or she does not have a current
license for the additional subject area.
(ii) The amount of the award and the number of
recipients selected by the Division of Higher Education is contingent on the
appropriation and availability of funding for that purpose;
(B)(i) A student may receive reimbursements up to but not
in excess of the cost of his or her student fees, books, and instructional
supplies at the public institution of higher education in this state
assessing the highest rate of student fees an award that shall not exceed the
cost of tuition and fees required to complete six (6) semester credit hours
per academic year.
(ii) For purposes of award disbursement under
subdivision (a)(2)(B)(i) of this section, an academic year begins in the fall
semester and runs through the summer semester;
(B) The reimbursements made to one (1) student within one
(1) fiscal year may not exceed the costs associated with six (6) semester
credit hours or the equivalent of six (6) semester credit hours; and
(C) All other requirements established by the Division of
Higher Education are met.
(b)(1) The Division of Higher Education shall determine priorities for
awarding reimbursements awards if there are more applicants than funds
available.
(2) Priorities shall be determined in coordination with the
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education and shall be based on the
needs of the state.

SECTION 66. Arkansas Code § 6-81-607(3), concerning the definition of
"student" under the Teacher Opportunity Program, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(F) Any other subject matter as determined by the
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
division.

SECTION 67. Arkansas Code §§ 6-81-608 and 6-81-609 are repealed.
6-81-608. Dual Licensure Incentive Program.
(a) There is created the Dual Licensure Incentive Program to encourage
classroom teachers currently employed by school districts in the state to
return to college to obtain licensure in one (1) or more additional subject
areas.
(b) The program shall be administered by the Division of Higher
Education.
(c)(1) A classroom teacher returning to college as a student may
receive a reimbursement not to exceed the cost of student fees, books, and
instructional supplies.
(2) The student fee reimbursement amount shall be based on the
student fees of the state-supported institution of higher education that
assesses the highest rate of student fees in this state.
(d) The reimbursement made to a classroom teacher returning to college
as a student in one (1) fiscal year may not exceed the cost associated with
six (6) semester credit hours or the equivalent of six (6) semester credit
hours.

6-81-609. Dual licensure funding.
(a)(1)(A) A classroom teacher employed by a school district in the
state may receive a reimbursement from the Dual Licensure Incentive Program
if the classroom teacher returns to an approved institution of higher
education to obtain licensure in an additional subject area:
(i) Declared to be a shortage area by the Division
of Elementary and Secondary Education;
(ii) That the classroom teacher is currently teaching
but for which he or she does not have a licensure; or
(iii) And grade level in which the school district
has requested a waiver under § 6-17-309.
(B)(i) A reimbursement from the Dual Licensure Incentive
Program shall include funding for the cost of tuition, books, and fees not to
exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000) each college year.
(ii) The amount of the reimbursement and the number
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
of reimbursement recipients selected by the Division of Higher Education is
contingent on the appropriation and availability of funding for such a
purpose.
(2) To be eligible for a reimbursement under the Dual Licensure
Incentive Program, the person shall be:
(A) Employed as a classroom teacher for no less than three
(3) years of teaching immediately preceding the application; and
(B) Accepted for enrollment in a classroom teacher
education program that will lead to a licensure to teach in a subject area
that:
(i) Is different from the classroom teacher's
current area of licensure; and
(ii) Either:
(a) Has been identified as a subject area with
a shortage of classroom teachers as declared by the Division of Elementary
and Secondary Education; or
(b) Is in the grade level and subject matter
area for which the school district has requested a waiver under § 6-17-309.
(b)(1) The Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall
promulgate rules as necessary to implement the Dual Licensure Incentive
Program.
(2) The number of classroom teacher participants each year shall
be determined by the amount of funding available for the Dual Licensure
Incentive Program and the limitations set under this section.

SECTION 68. Arkansas Code § 6-82-108(e), concerning funding of the
Academic Support Scholarship with certain remaining funds, is amended to read
as follows:
(e) A scholarship under this section shall be funded with any funds
remaining after the division allocates sufficient funding to award Arkansas
Academic Challenge Scholarships under § 6-85-201 et seq., Arkansas Workforce
Challenge Scholarships under § 6-85-301 et seq., and Arkansas Concurrent
Challenge Scholarships under § 6-85-401 et seq ACCESS to Acceleration
Scholarships under § 6-85-701 et seq.

SECTION 69. Arkansas Code § 6-82-302 is amended to read as follows:
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
6-82-302. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) “Academic ability” means the intellectual standing of a
student. In determining superior academic ability, the Division of Higher
Education shall examine the student's high school records, competitive
examination scores, and demonstrated leadership capabilities;
(2) “Approved institution” means a public state-supported
institution of higher education or private college or university:
(A) Which is dedicated to educational purposes, located in
Arkansas, or located out of state and educating Arkansas residents in
dentistry, optometry, veterinary medicine, podiatry, chiropractic, or
osteopathy under agreement with the Southern Regional Education Board,
accredited by an accrediting agency certified and recognized by the United
States Department of Education or the Division of Agency Evaluation and
Institutional Accreditation, or a school giving satisfactory assurance that
it has the potential for accreditation and is making progress which, if
continued, will result in its achieving accreditation professional programs
not offered in the state under the Arkansas Health Education Grant Program;
(B) Which does not discriminate in the admission of
students on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, or national origin; and
(C) Which subscribes to the principle of academic freedom;
(3) “Competitive examination” means a standardized examination
measuring achievement which is administered annually on a specified date and
at a specified location and which is announced publicly;
(4) “Eligible student” means a legal resident of the State of
Arkansas as defined by the Division of Higher Education who:
(A) Is eligible for admission as a full-time student;
(B) Declares an intent to matriculate in an approved
institution in Arkansas; and
(C) Graduates from:
(i) A a high school in this state, for Arkansas
Governor's Scholars; or
(ii) A high school, for Arkansas Governor's
Distinguished Scholars;
(5) "Exemplary academic achievement" means a student that
achieves exemplary performance, as determined by the division, based on one
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(1) or more of the following:
(A) SAT, CLT, or ACT;
(B) High school grade point average;
(C) High school rank upon graduation;
(D) Associate degree upon graduation from high school; and
(E) Being a recipient of a diploma of distinction;
(5)(A)(6)(A) “Extraordinary academic ability” means:
(i) Achievement of a superscore, as defined by § 6-
85-204, of 32 or above on the ACT or a score of 1410 or above on the SAT; and
(ii) Either:
(a) For students graduating from high school
after December 31, 2001, A student graduating from high school with an
achievement of a high school grade point average of 3.5 or above on a 4.0
scale; or
(b) Selection as a finalist in either the
National Merit Scholarship competition, the National Hispanic Recognition
Program, or the National Achievement Scholarship competition conducted by the
National Merit Scholarship Corporation.
(B) For students graduating after December 31, 2001, the
The ACT superscores and SAT scores shall be earned by December 31 February 28
prior to the application deadline in order for the scores to be considered by
the Division of Higher Education division for a scholarship award;
(6)(7) “Full-time student” means a legal resident of Arkansas
who is in attendance at an approved private or public institution and who is
enrolled in at least twelve (12) credit hours the first semester and fifteen
(15) hours thereafter, or other reasonable academic equivalent as defined by
the Division of Higher Education division;
(7)(8) “Scholarship” means an award to an eligible student for
matriculation in an approved institution in the State of Arkansas; and
(8)(9) “Undergraduate student” means an individual who is
enrolled in a postsecondary educational program which leads to or is directly
creditable toward the individual's first baccalaureate degree.

SECTION 70. Arkansas Code § 6-82-306, concerning eligibility under the
Arkansas Governor's Scholars Program, is amended to add additional
subsections to read as follows:
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(e) An Arkansas Governor’s Scholar shall be chosen based on a student
who:
(1) Graduates with a diploma of distinction based on criteria
determined by the State Board of Education; or
(2) Earns an associate degree upon completing the summer term
immediately following graduation from high school.
(f) An Arkansas Governor's Scholar shall be chosen based on a student
exhibiting the highest exemplary academic achievement if:
(1) There are no recipients of the Arkansas Governor's
Distinguished Scholarship; or
(2) An Arkansas Governor's Scholar under subsection (e) of this
section is not chosen in any given Arkansas county.

SECTION 71. Arkansas Code § 6-82-310, concerning the use of funds
under the Arkansas Governor's Scholars Program, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(c) In the event the number of students who qualify for a scholarship
under this subchapter during an academic year exceeds the amount of funds
appropriated to the Higher Education Grants Fund Account for purposes of
funding students who qualify for a scholarship under this subchapter during
the given academic year, the excess awards that qualify for distribution
under this subchapter shall be funded with any net proceeds from the state
lottery remaining after the Division of Higher Education allocates sufficient
funding to award the following scholarships at levels equivalent to the
awards made in the previous academic year:
(1) Arkansas Academic Challenge Scholarship, § 6-85-201 et seq.; and
(2) Arkansas Workforce Challenge Scholarship, § 6-85-301 et seq.

SECTION 72. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 82, Subchapter 5, is
repealed.
Subchapter 5 — Children of Law Enforcement Officers, Etc.

6-82-501. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Child” or “children” means any natural child, adopted
child, or stepchild who is eligible under § 6-82-504;
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(2) “Division of Community Correction employee” means any
employee of the Division of Community Correction who suffers fatal injuries
or wounds or becomes permanently and totally disabled as a result of injuries
or wounds that occurred through contact with parolees, probationers, or
center residents;
(3)(A) “Emergency medical services personnel” means an
individual licensed by the Department of Health at any level established by
the rules adopted by the State Board of Health under the Emergency Medical
Services Act, § 20-13-201 et seq., and authorized to perform those services
set forth in the rules.
(B) This shall include without limitation an emergency
medical technician, advanced emergency medical technician, paramedic,
emergency medical services instructor, or emergency medical services
instructor trainer;
(4) “Firefighter” means any firefighter employed on a full-time
or volunteer duty status while actually engaged in the performance of his or
her duties;
(5) “Law enforcement officer” means a:
(A) Constable, which includes all duly elected constables
of any beat of any county within the state while actually engaged in the
performance of their duties concerning the criminal laws of the county and
state;
(B) Game warden, which includes all appointed game wardens
employed by the State of Arkansas on a full-time duty status while actually
engaged in their duties concerning the game laws of this state;
(C) Municipal and college or university police officer,
which includes all law enforcement officers of any municipality, college, or
university who are regular duty personnel on full-time status and does not
include auxiliary officers or those serving on a temporary or part-time
status;
(D) Sheriff or deputy sheriff, which includes all law
enforcement officers of full-time status on a regular basis serving the
sheriff's department of any county but does not include deputy sheriffs who
are engaged in administrative or civil duty or deputy sheriffs serving in a
temporary capacity or part-time basis; and
(E) State highway patrolman, which includes any law
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
enforcement officer, regardless of department or bureau, of the Division of
Arkansas State Police;
(6) “State correction employee” means any employee of the
Division of Correction or the Arkansas Correctional School District who
becomes subject to injury through contact with inmates or parolees of the
Division of Correction;
(7) “State forestry employee” means an employee of the Arkansas
Forestry Commission who is actively engaged in his or her duties of fighting
forest fires;
(8) “State highway employee” means any employee of the Arkansas
Department of Transportation who actively engages in highway maintenance,
construction, or traffic operations on the roadways and bridges of the state
highway system while the roadways and bridges are open for use by the
traveling public;
(9) “State parks employee” means any employee of the Department
of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism who is a commissioned law enforcement officer
or emergency response employee while actively engaged in the performance of
his or her duties; and
(10) “Teacher” means any person employed by a public school for
the purpose of giving instruction and whose employment requires state
certification.

6-82-502. Rules.
The Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board is directed and
empowered to promulgate rules as necessary to administer benefits awarded
under this subchapter by the Arkansas State Claims Commission.

6-82-503. Entitlement.
(a) If any Arkansas law enforcement officer, full-time or volunteer
firefighter, emergency medical technician, state highway employee, state
correction employee, Division of Community Correction employee, state parks
employee, teacher, or state forestry employee suffers fatal injuries or
wounds or becomes permanently and totally disabled as a result of injuries or
wounds that occurred in the performance of a hazardous duty within the scope
of his or her employment or that occurred en route to or returning from a
location where a hazardous situation existed, his or her children and spouse
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
shall be entitled to a total of eight (8) semesters, or the equivalent
thereof, of scholarship awards without cost, exclusive of books, food, school
supplies, materials, and dues or fees for extracurricular activities, at any
state-supported college, university, or technical institute of his or her
choice within this state. Up to four (4) semesters, or the equivalent
thereof, may be taken at a technical institute.
(b) Scholarship benefits shall not accrue under this subchapter to any
person if the wounds or injuries suffered by any law enforcement officer,
firefighter, emergency medical technician, state highway employee, state
correction employee, Division of Community Correction employee, state parks
employee, teacher, or state forestry employee are self-inflicted or if the
death is self-induced.
(c) Unless § 6-82-504(e) is applicable, the Arkansas State Claims
Commission shall award any scholarship benefit provided by this subchapter at
the same time that any death benefit or total and permanent disability
benefit is awarded by the commission under the provisions of § 21-5-701 et
seq.

6-82-504. Awards to children.
(a) In order for a natural child to be eligible to receive a
scholarship benefit:
(1) The child must have been born prior to the date of the death
or total and permanent disability of the law enforcement officer,
firefighter, emergency medical technician, state highway employee, state
correction employee, Division of Community Correction employee, state parks
employee, teacher, or state forestry employee; or
(2) The law enforcement officer, firefighter, emergency medical
technician, state highway employee, state correction employee, Division of
Community Correction employee, state parks employee, teacher, or state
forestry employee or the spouse of the law enforcement officer, firefighter,
emergency medical technician, state highway employee, state correction
employee, Division of Community Correction employee, state parks employee,
teacher, or state forestry employee must have been pregnant with the child at
the time of the death or total and permanent disability of the law
enforcement officer, firefighter, emergency medical technician, state highway
employee, state correction employee, Division of Community Correction
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
employee, state parks employee, teacher, or state forestry employee.
(b) In order for an adopted child to be eligible to receive a
scholarship benefit:
(1) The child must have been adopted prior to the date of the
death or total and permanent disability of the law enforcement officer,
firefighter, emergency medical technician, state highway employee, state
correction employee, Division of Community Correction employee, state parks
employee, teacher, or state forestry employee; or
(2) The child's adoption process must have begun prior to the
date of the death or total and permanent disability of the law enforcement
officer, firefighter, emergency medical technician, state highway employee,
state correction employee, Division of Community Correction employee, state
parks employee, teacher, or state forestry employee.
(c) In order for a stepchild under nineteen (19) years of age to be
eligible to receive a scholarship benefit:
(1) The stepchild must have been listed as a dependent on the
federal and state income tax returns of the law enforcement officer,
firefighter, emergency medical technician, state highway employee, state
correction employee, Division of Community Correction employee, state parks
employee, teacher, or state forestry employee in each of the five (5) income
years immediately prior to the date of the death or total and permanent
disability of the law enforcement officer, firefighter, emergency medical
technician, state highway employee, state correction employee, Division of
Community Correction employee, state parks employee, teacher, or state
forestry employee; and
(2) The stepchild must have received more than one-half (½) of
his or her financial support from the law enforcement officer, firefighter,
emergency medical technician, state highway employee, state correction
employee, Division of Community Correction employee, state parks employee,
teacher, or state forestry employee in each of the five (5) income years
immediately prior to the date of the death or total and permanent disability
of the law enforcement officer, firefighter, emergency medical technician,
state highway employee, state correction employee, Division of Community
Correction employee, state parks employee, teacher, or state forestry
employee.
(d) In order for a stepchild nineteen (19) years of age or older to be
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
eligible to receive a scholarship benefit:
(1) The stepchild must have been listed as a dependent on the
federal and state income tax returns of the law enforcement officer,
firefighter, emergency medical technician, state highway employee, state
correction employee, Division of Community Correction employee, state parks
employee, teacher, or state forestry employee in each of five (5) income
years during the eight (8) years immediately prior to the date of the death
or total and permanent disability of the law enforcement officer,
firefighter, emergency medical technician, state highway employee, state
correction employee, Division of Community Correction employee, teacher,
state parks employee, or state forestry employee; and
(2) The stepchild must have received more than one-half (½) of
his or her financial support from the law enforcement officer, firefighter,
emergency medical technician, state highway employee, state correction
employee, Division of Community Correction employee, state parks employee,
teacher, or state forestry employee in each of five (5) income years during
the eight (8) years immediately prior to the date of the death or total and
permanent disability of the law enforcement officer, firefighter, emergency
medical technician, state highway employee, state correction employee,
Division of Community Correction employee, state parks employee, teacher, or
state forestry employee.
(e) If the covered public employee or his or her heirs did not file
for the available death or disability benefit, but were otherwise eligible to
receive, within the time frame provided in § 21-5-703, then the covered
public employee's child or children who would have otherwise been eligible to
receive the provided educational scholarship benefit under this section may
individually file prior to their twenty-first birthdays a claim to receive
the provided educational scholarship benefit.

6-82-505. Limits for scholarship.
(a) No child will be entitled to receive benefits under this
subchapter during any semester or quarter when the child has reached twenty-
three (23) years of age on or before the first day of the semester or
quarter.
(b) No spouse will be eligible for the education benefit if he or she
remarries. The benefit will cease at the end of the semester at which the
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
spouse is currently enrolled at the time of the marriage.

6-82-506. Written application for benefits.
Any person claiming benefits awarded by the Arkansas State Claims
Commission under the provisions of this subchapter shall make written
application with the Division of Higher Education on forms provided by the
division.

6-82-507. Renewal of scholarship.
To retain eligibility for a scholarship benefit under this subchapter,
a recipient shall:
(1) Maintain a minimum of a 2.0 grade point average on a 4.0
scholastic grading scale; and
(2) Meet any other continuing eligibility criteria established
by the Division of Higher Education.

SECTION 73. Arkansas Code § 6-82-601(i)(3), concerning funding by
certain scholarships related to tuition waivers for dependents of certain
veterans, is amended to read as follows:
(3) Arkansas Concurrent Challenge Scholarship, § 6-85-401 et seq
ACCESS to Acceleration Scholarship, § 6-85-701 et seq.
SECTION 74. Arkansas Code § 6-82-1802(c), concerning continuing
eligibility under the Arkansas Future Grant Program, is amended to read as
follows:
(c) A student may continue to be eligible until the student has:
(1) Received the grant for five (5) academic semesters a maximum
of seventy-five (75) course credit hours in which the student is enrolled;
(2) Obtained an associate degree; or
(3) Failed to maintain satisfactory academic progress, as
determined by the approved institution of higher education in which the
student is enrolled; or
(4) Failed to complete the mentoring or community service
requirements under § 6-82-1804.

SECTION 75. Arkansas Code § 6-82-1803(a)(1), concerning distribution
of the Arkansas Future Grant Program, is amended to read as follows:
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(a)(1) An Arkansas Future Grant shall be in:
(A) Distributed in accordance with the Division of Higher
Education's stacking policy under § 6-80-105; and
(B) In an amount equal to the tuition, fees, and other
charges incurred by a student who meets the requirements under § 6-82-1802 to
attend an approved institution of higher education less the amount the
student receives in:
(A) State-supported student financial assistance;
(B) Federal student financial assistance; and
(C) Private scholarships.

SECTION 76. Arkansas Code § 6-82-1804(a), concerning the written
agreement requirements for a recipient of an Arkansas Future Grant, is
amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) A student who receives an Arkansas Future Grant shall enter
into a written agreement with the Division of Higher Education to:
(1)(A) Receive monthly mentoring from a mentor from an
organization determined by the Division of Higher Education.
(B) A mentor under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section
shall:
(i) Receive annual mentoring training:
(a) Developed by the Division of Higher
Education; and
(b) Provided by a local volunteer group
approved by the Division of Higher Education; and
(ii) Certify to the Division of Higher Education
that at least one (1) time each semester the mentor has provided mentoring
services by telephone, email, or in person to each student he or she is
mentoring;
(2)(A) Complete at least ten (10) hours of community service
each semester the student receives a grant.
(B)(i) A student may select a community service project
that meets requirements developed by the Division of Higher Education.
(ii) An approved institution of higher education may
provide community services opportunities designed to benefit the approved
institution of higher education community or the broader local community.
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(C) A student shall certify his or her community service
to the approved institution of higher education by the last regular day of
the semester the student received the grant; and
(3)(A) Reside reside in this state for three (3) consecutive
years six (6) months and be employed beginning within six (6) months after
receiving an associate degree or a certification.
(B)(2) The Division of Higher Education may defer the
requirement under subdivision (a)(3)(A) subdivision (a)(1) of this section
if:
(i)(A) The Division of Higher Education, in
consultation with the Division of Workforce Services, determines that there
was no employment position available that would reasonably enable the student
to meet this requirement; or
(ii)(B) Special circumstances as determined by the
Division of Higher Education exist.
(C)(3) After the period of deferral, the student shall
begin or resume working in this state or become subject to repayment under
subsection (b) of this section.

SECTION 77. Arkansas Code § 6-82-2205(b), concerning the requirements
for an eligible postsecondary institution under the Arkansas Teacher Academy
Scholarship Program, is amended to read as follows:
(b) An eligible postsecondary institution may:
(1) Develop develop a portfolio of teacher preparation programs
to offer as part of its Arkansas Teacher Academy;
(2)(A) Give priority to students in grades eleven (11) and
twelve (12).
(B) However, an eligible postsecondary institution shall
not exclude students in grades nine (9) and ten (10) from its Arkansas
Teacher Academy; and
(3)(A) Use scholarship funds that exceed the cost of tuition and
fees at the eligible postsecondary institution to support its Arkansas
Teacher Academy costs.
(B) However, if a scholarship awarded to an academy
attendee under this subchapter does not cover the eligible postsecondary
institution's tuition and fees after an academy attendee receives all other
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
financial gifts, financial aid, and grants, the eligible postsecondary
institution shall not charge an academy attendee awarded a scholarship under
this subchapter the remaining difference.

SECTION 78. Arkansas Code § 6-82-2206(a), concerning scholarships
under the Arkansas Teacher Academy Scholarship Program, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1) An Effective beginning the 2025-2026 academic year, an eligible
postsecondary institution shall provide to each academy attendee who is
accepted and enrolled in its Arkansas Teacher Academy program an annual
scholarship, not to exceed the maximum award as determined by the Division of
Higher Education each eligible semester, up to the actual cost of the:
(A) Eligible postsecondary institution's tuition and fees
for a maximum of:
(i) Two (2) academic years, or four (4) academic
semesters, not to exceed sixty (60) academic hours, or completion of the
program for an academy attendee who is a graduate student enrolled in the
Arkansas Teacher Academy at the eligible postsecondary institution;
(ii) Four (4) academic years, or eight (8) academic
semesters, not to exceed one hundred twenty (120) academic hours, or
completion of the program for an undergraduate student enrolled in the
Arkansas Teacher Academy at the eligible postsecondary institution; and
(iii)(a) Two (2) academic years, or four (4)
academic semesters, not to exceed sixty (60) academic hours, or completion of
the program for a community college student enrolled in the Arkansas Teacher
Academy at the eligible postsecondary institution.
(b) A student who qualifies under subdivision
(a)(1)(A)(iii)(a) of this section shall receive continued eligibility for two
(2) additional academic years or four (4) additional academic semesters at a
postsecondary institution that is an undergraduate institution; and
(B) Obtainment of a teaching license issued by the State
Board of Education, including without limitation the actual cost of one (1)
exam required for obtaining a teaching license issued by the state board.
(2) A scholarship distributed to an academy attendee under
subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall be distributed only after all other
financial gifts, financial aid, and grants have been received by an academy
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
attendee enrolled in an Arkansas Teacher Academy at an eligible postsecondary
institution in accordance with the division's scholarship stacking policy
under § 6-80-105.
(3) In compliance with the division's scholarship stacking
policy, a student's total financial aid package, which can include multiple
scholarships, shall not exceed the recognized cost of attendance at a state-
supported institution of higher education.

SECTION 79. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 82 is amended to add
additional subchapters to read as follows:
Subchapter 25 — Arkansas Heroes Scholarship Act

6-82-2501. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Arkansas Heroes
Scholarship Act".

6-82-2502. Purpose.
The purpose of this subchapter is to create a scholarship to be known
as the "Arkansas Heroes Scholarship" that honors the heroic efforts of the
individuals who served as Arkansas's heroes and their families.

6-82-2503. Definitions.
(a) As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Arkansas hero” means:
(A) One (1) of the following who suffers a fatal injury or
wound or becomes permanently and totally disabled as a result of injuries or
wounds that occurred in the performance of a hazardous duty within the scope
of his or her employment or that occurred en route to or returning from a
location where a hazardous situation existed:
(i) A law enforcement officer;
(ii) A firefighter;
(iii) An emergency medical technician;
(iv) A state highway employee;
(v) A state correction employee;
(vi) A Division of Community Correction employee;
(vii) A state parks employee; or
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(viii) A state forestry employee;
(B) A disabled veteran;
(C) A prisoner of war;
(D) A recipient of a Medal of Honor or Purple Heart;
(E) A person declared to be missing in action or killed in
action;
(F) A person killed on ordnance delivery;
(G) A teacher who suffers a fatal injury or wound or
becomes permanently and totally disabled as a result of injuries or wounds
that occurred due to an act of violence at a public school or open-enrollment
charter school in this state;
(2) “Child” means a natural child, an adopted child, or a
stepchild who is eligible to receive a scholarship under this subchapter;
(3) “Disabled veteran” means a person who has been awarded
either:
(A) United States Armed Forces disability retirement
benefits; or
(B) Special monthly compensation by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs for service-connected, one hundred percent
(100%) total and permanent disability;
(4) “Division of Community Correction employee” means an
employee of the Division of Community Correction who suffers a fatal injury
or wound or becomes permanently and totally disabled because of an injury or
wound that occurred through contact with a parolee, probationer, or center
resident;
(5)(A) “Emergency medical services personnel” means an
individual licensed by the Department of Health at any level established by
the rules adopted by the State Board of Health under the Emergency Medical
Services Act, § 20-13-201 et seq., and authorized to perform the services
under the rules.
(B) "Emergency medical services personnel" includes
without limitation:
(i) An emergency medical technician;
(ii) An advanced emergency medical technician;
(iii) A paramedic;
(iv) An emergency medical services instructor; and
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(v) An emergency medical services instructor
trainer;
(6) “Firefighter” means a firefighter employed on a full-time or
volunteer status while actually engaged in the performance of his or her
duties;
(7) “Law enforcement officer” means a:
(A) Constable, including without limitation all elected
constables of any beat of any county within the state while actually engaged
in the performance of his or her duties concerning the criminal laws of the
county and state;
(B) Game warden, including without limitation all
appointed game wardens employed by the state on a full-time status while
actually engaged in his or her duties concerning the game laws of this state;
(C)(i) Municipal and a state-supported institution of
higher education police officer, including without limitation all law
enforcement officers of any municipality or state-supported institution of
higher education who are regular duty personnel on full-time status.
(ii) Municipal and a state-supported institution of
higher education police officer does not include auxiliary officers or those
serving on a temporary or part-time status;
(D)(i) Sheriff or deputy sheriff, including without
limitation all law enforcement officers on full-time status on a regular
basis serving the sheriff's department of any county.
(ii) Sheriff or deputy sheriff does not include a
deputy sheriff who is:
(a) Engaged in administrative or civil duty;
or
(b) Serving in a temporary capacity or part-
time status;
(E) State highway patrolman, including without limitation
any law enforcement officer, regardless of department or bureau, of the
Division of Arkansas State Police; and
(F) Any other person employed by the State of Arkansas or
a political subdivision of the State of Arkansas as an appointed law
enforcement officer who is responsible for the prevention and detection of
crime and the enforcement of the criminal, traffic, or highway laws of this
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
state;
(8) “Ordnance delivery” means the piloting of or flying in an
experimental or test aircraft while determining its fitness or ability to
perform its military function or mission;
(9)(A) “Prisoner of war”, “person missing in action”, “person
killed in action”, and “person killed on ordnance delivery” mean a person
who:
(i) Was a legal resident of the State of Arkansas at
the time that person entered the service of the United States Armed Forces or
whose official residence is within the State of Arkansas; and
(ii) Who, while serving in the United States Armed
Forces, has been declared to be a prisoner of war, a person missing in
action, a person killed in action as established by the United States
Secretary of Defense after January 1, 1960, or a person killed on ordnance
delivery.
(B) “Prisoner of war”, “person missing in action”, “person
killed in action”, and “person killed on ordnance delivery” apply whether or
not capture or death occurred during a declared war or as a result of hostile
action.
(C) A death as a result of injuries received while serving
in the United States Armed Forces or Arkansas National Guard is only covered
by this subdivision (a)(9) if the death occurred while on active duty or
state active duty;
(10) “State correction employee” means an employee of the
Division of Correction or the Arkansas Correctional School District who
becomes subject to injury through contact with an inmate or parolee of the
Division of Correction;
(11) “State forestry employee” means an employee of the Arkansas
Forestry Commission who is actively engaged in his or her duties of fighting
forest fires;
(12) “State highway employee” means an employee of the Arkansas
Department of Transportation who actively engages in highway maintenance,
construction, or traffic operations on the roadways and bridges of the state
highway system while the roadways and bridges are open for use by the
traveling public;
(13) “State parks employee” means an employee of the Department
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism who is a commissioned law enforcement officer
or emergency response employee while actively engaged in the performance of
his or her duties;
(14) “Teacher” means a person employed by a public school
district for the purpose of providing direct instruction to students and
whose employment requires state certification; and
(15) “United States Armed Forces dependent” means a spouse, a
child born to or conceived by, an adopted child, a child under legal
guardianship, or a stepchild of a:
(A) Disabled veteran;
(B) Prisoner of war; or
(C) Person declared to be:
(i) Missing in action;
(ii) Killed in action; or
(iii) Killed on ordnance delivery.

6-82-2504. Rules.
The Division of Higher Education may promulgate rules to implement this
subchapter.

6-82-2505. Eligibility for Arkansas Heroes Scholarship.
(a) Eligibility for the Arkansas Heroes Scholarship requires one (1)
of the following:
(1) The student has been a legal Arkansas resident for at least
one (1) year before submitting a scholarship application;
(2) The student was born before the date of the death or
disability of the Arkansas hero; or
(3) The Arkansas hero or the spouse of the Arkansas hero was
pregnant with the student at the time of the death or disability of the
Arkansas hero.
(b) In order for an adopted child to be eligible to receive a
scholarship benefit:
(1) The adopted child is required to have been adopted before
the date of the death or disability of the Arkansas hero; or
(2) The adopted child's adoption process is required to have
begun before the date of the death or disability of the Arkansas hero.
03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(c) In order for a stepchild under nineteen (19) years of age to be
eligible to receive a scholarship benefit, the stepchild under nineteen (19)
years of age shall have:
(1) Been listed as a dependent on the federal and state income
tax returns of the Arkansas hero in each of the five (5) income years
immediately before the date of the death or disability of the Arkansas hero;
and
(2) Received more than one-half (1/2) of his or her financial
support from the Arkansas hero in each of the five (5) income years
immediately before the date of the death or disability of the Arkansas hero.
(d) In order for a stepchild who is nineteen (19) years of age or
older to be eligible to receive a scholarship benefit, the stepchild who is
nineteen (19) years or older shall have:
(1) Been listed as a dependent on the federal and state income
tax returns of the Arkansas hero in at least five (5) of the eight (8) income
years immediately before the date of the death or disability of the Arkansas
hero; and
(2) Received more than one-half (1/2) of his or her financial
support from the Arkansas hero in at least five (5) of the eight (8) income
years immediately before the date of the death or disability of the Arkansas
hero.
(e) If a covered public employee, as defined in § 21-5-701, or his or
her heirs did not file for the available death or disability benefit but were
otherwise eligible to receive the death or disability benefit within the time
frame provided in § 21-5-703, then the covered public employee's child or
children who would have otherwise been eligible to receive the provided
educational scholarship benefit under this section may individually file
before his or her twenty-first birthday a claim to receive the provided
educational scholarship benefit if:
(1) The student is considered a United States Armed Forces
dependent as provided in § 6-82-2503; or
(2) The student is a dependent of an Arkansas hero who suffered
fatal injuries or wounds or becomes disabled as a result of injuries or
wounds that occurred in the performance of a hazardous duty within the scope
of his or her employment or that occurred en route to or returning from a
location where a hazardous situation existed.
100 03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(f) Scholarship benefits may not accrue under this subchapter to a
person if the wound or injury suffered by an Arkansas hero is self-inflicted
or if the death of an Arkansas hero is self-inflicted.
(g) Unless subsection (e) of this section is applicable, the Arkansas
State Claims Commission shall award any scholarship benefit provided by this
subchapter at the same time that any death benefit or disability benefit is
awarded by the commission under the provisions of § 21-5-701 et seq.

6-82-2506. Eligibility restrictions.
(a) A child shall not be entitled to receive benefits under this
subchapter during any semester or quarter when the child has reached twenty-
six (26) years of age on or before the first day of the semester or quarter.
(b)(1) A spouse shall not be eligible to receive benefits under this
subchapter if he or she remarries.
(2) The benefits under this subchapter shall cease at the end of
the semester in which the spouse is currently enrolled at the time of the
marriage.

6-82-2507. Applications.
(a) An eligible student shall apply to the Division of Higher
Education for benefits under this subchapter.
(b) A United States Armed Forces dependent shall:
(1) Apply for the Survivors' and Dependents' Educational
Assistance program, 38 U.S.C. § 3500 et seq., as it existed on January 1,
2025, with the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; and
(2) Provide the division with proof of:
(A) Acceptance into the Survivors’ and Dependents’
Educational Assistance program; or
(B) Noneligibility for the Survivors’ and Dependents’
Educational Assistance program following application.
(c) Except as provided under subsection (d) of this section, a
dependent of an Arkansas hero, upon his or her being accepted for enrollment
into any private, nonprofit institution of higher education in the State of
Arkansas or a state-supported institution of higher education in the State of
Arkansas, may obtain his or her first bachelor's degree for so long as he or
she is eligible with state assistance for tuition, fees, or other charges as
101 03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
provided under this subsection.
(d)(1) The state assistance under this subchapter is limited to the
tuition, fees, or other charges that exceed the amount of monetary benefits
the dependent is eligible to receive from the Survivors' and Dependents'
Educational Assistance program during the months included in each semester in
which the dependent is enrolled.
(2) If the dependent is not eligible for monetary benefits from
the Survivors' and Dependents' Educational Assistance program but is eligible
for the benefits under this subchapter, the dependent may obtain a bachelor's
degree free of tuition, fees, or other charges from a private, nonprofit
institution of higher education in this state or a state-supported
institution of higher education in this state.
(3) However, the state assistance awarded to a dependent
attending a private, nonprofit institution of higher education in this state
shall not exceed the maximum amount of state assistance awarded to dependents
attending a state-supported institution of higher education in this state.
(e) Once a person qualifies as a dependent under this subchapter,
there shall be no situation such as the return of the parent or the reported
death of the parent that will remove the dependent from the provisions or
benefits of this subchapter.
(f) An eligible recipient shall receive a scholarship for one (1)
academic year, renewable for up to three (3) additional academic years if the
recipient meets continuing eligibility criteria established by the division.
(g) In compliance with the division's scholarship stacking policy, a
student's total financial aid package, which can include multiple
scholarships, shall not exceed the recognized cost of attendance at a state-
supported institution of higher education.
(h) In the event the number of students who qualify for a scholarship
under this subchapter during an academic year exceeds the amount of funds
appropriated to the Higher Education Grants Fund Account for purposes of
funding students who qualify for scholarship under this subchapter during the
given academic year, the excess awards that qualify for distribution under
this subchapter shall be funded with any net proceeds from the state lottery
remaining after the division allocates sufficient funding to award the
following scholarships at levels equivalent to the awards made in the
previous academic year:
102 03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(1) Arkansas Academic Challenge Scholarship, § 6-85-201 et seq.;
and
(2) Arkansas Workforce Challenge Scholarship, § 6-85-301 et seq.

6-82-2508. Scholarship funding and continued eligibility.
(a) The state assistance under this subchapter is limited to the
tuition, fees, and other expenses required for the first bachelor’s degree
earned by the dependent.
(b)(1) An eligible dependent shall be entitled to a total of eight (8)
semesters, or the equivalent thereof, of scholarship awards without cost,
exclusive of books, food, school supplies, materials, and dues or fees for
extracurricular activities, at any state-supported institution of higher
education or technical institute of his or her choice within this state.
(2) The eligible dependent may take up to four (4) semesters, or
the equivalent thereof, at a technical institute.
(c) To retain eligibility for a scholarship benefit under this
subchapter, a recipient shall:
(1) Maintain a minimum of a 2.0 grade point average on a 4.0
scholastic grading scale; and
(2) Meet any other continuing eligibility criteria established
by the Division of Higher Education.
(d) If a recipient fails to meet eligibility criteria, he or she may
apply for state assistance under this subchapter a maximum of one (1)
additional time once eligibility is reestablished.

Subchapter 26 — Governor's Higher Education Transition Scholarship Program

6-82-2601. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Governor's
Higher Education Transition Scholarship Program".

6-82-2602. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Eligible student" means an Arkansas student with a
disability admitted to a qualifying program at a state-supported institution
of higher education;
103 03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(2) "Inclusive Higher Education Accreditation Council" means the
independent, nonprofit accreditation agency for postsecondary programs for
students with an intellectual disability; and
(3) "Qualifying program" means a postsecondary education program
for a student with an intellectual disability that is accredited by the
Inclusive Higher Education Accreditation Council.

6-82-2603. Creation — Eligibility.
(a) There is established the Governor's Higher Education Transition
Scholarship Program within the Division of Higher Education.
(b) An eligible student who receives a Governor's Higher Education
Transition Scholarship shall maintain eligibility for up to eight (8)
continuous semesters or until credentialing is obtained, whichever occurs
first.

6-82-2604. Scholarship awards.
(a) Scholarship awards under this subchapter are contingent upon
availability of funds.
(b)(1) Scholarship awards shall not exceed the institutional cost of
attendance.
(2) The maximum award amount per qualifying semester that a
student may receive is two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).
(3) A scholarship award may be applied to tuition, mandatory
fees, programmatic fees, room and board, supplies, and extended support
services.

6-82-2605. Rules.
The Division of Higher Education may promulgate rules to govern
administration of the Governor's Higher Education Transition Scholarship
Program, including without limitation application forms and deadlines.

SECTION 80. Arkansas Code § 6-85-207 is amended to read as follows:
6-85-207. Additional eligibility requirements for traditional students.
In addition to the basic eligibility requirements of § 6-85-206, an
applicant is eligible as a traditional student if the applicant either:
(1)(A) Graduated from an Arkansas public high school and has a
104 03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
minimum superscore of nineteen (19) on the ACT or the equivalent score on an
ACT equivalent; or
(B) Upon graduation from high school:
(i) Achieved a minimum grade point average of 3.0
during high school;
(ii) Completed at least one (1) college readiness
assessment; and
(iii)(a) Achieved a diploma of merit as defined in
rules promulgated by the State Board of Education.
(b) Proof of attainment of the diploma of
merit under subdivision (1)(B)(iii)(a) of this section shall be submitted
with the student's scholarship application; or
(2)(A) Has a disability identified under the Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq., as it existed on July
1, 2009, and graduated from an Arkansas public high school, and either: meets
the requirements defined in subdivision (1) of this section.
(A) Had a minimum composite score of nineteen (19) on the
ACT or the equivalent score on an ACT equivalent; or
(B) Scored proficient or higher on all state-mandated end-
of-course assessments, including without limitation end-of-course assessments
on:
(i) Algebra I;
(ii) Geometry;
(iii) Biology; and
(iv) Literacy;
(3) Achieved a minimum superscore of nineteen (19) on the ACT or
the equivalent score on an ACT equivalent and:
(B) A student shall also meet one (1) of the following
eligibility requirements:
(A) Graduated (i) Graduate from a private high school, an
out-of-state high school, or a home school high school; or
(B)(ii) In the year in which the student would have been a
junior or senior in high school, completed the requirements for high school
graduation and obtained a high school equivalency diploma approved by the
Adult Education Section instead of receiving a diploma; or
(4)(iii) Meets one (1) of the following criteria:
105 03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(A)(a) Was enrolled at an institution of higher education
in the immediately preceding academic year as a full-time, first-time
freshman;
(B)(b) Did not receive a scholarship under this subchapter
as a full-time, first-time freshman;
(C)(c) Successfully completed with the equivalent of a
minimum letter grade of “D” at least twenty-seven (27) semester hours of
courses as a full-time, first-time freshman; and or
(D)(d) Achieved a postsecondary grade point average of at
least 2.5 on a 4.0 scale as a full-time, first-time freshman.

SECTION 81. Arkansas Code § 6-85-212(d)(1)(A), concerning scholarship
award amounts under the Arkansas Academic Challenge Scholarship Program, is
amended to read as follows:
(d)(1)(A) Subject to the availability of net revenue, the scholarship
award amount under this subchapter for an academic year for a full-time
recipient enrolled in a four-year approved institution of higher education
is:
(i) One Two thousand dollars ($1,000) ($2,000) for a
recipient who has earned less than twenty-seven (27) semester credit hours;
(ii) Four thousand dollars ($4,000) for a recipient
who has earned at least twenty-seven (27) semester credit hours but less than
fifty-seven (57) semester credit hours;
(iii) Four thousand dollars ($4,000) for a recipient
who has earned at least fifty-seven (57) semester credit hours but less than
eighty-seven (87) semester credit hours; and
(iv)(a) Five thousand dollars ($5,000) for a
recipient who has earned at least eighty-seven (87) semester credit hours but
no more than one hundred twenty (120) semester credit hours unless the
recipient is enrolled in a baccalaureate degree program that requires more
than one hundred twenty (120) semester credit hours, but not more than one
hundred thirty (130) semester credit hours, as provided under § 6-61-232,
then up to the number of credit hours required to complete the baccalaureate
program.
(b) A recipient shall receive no more than one
(1) year of the scholarship provided under subdivision (d)(1)(A)(iv)(a) of
106 03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
this section unless the recipient is enrolled in a baccalaureate degree
program that requires more than one hundred twenty (120) semester credit
hours as provided under § 6-61-232.
(c)(1) A recipient who is eligible to receive
the scholarship under subdivision (d)(1)(A)(iv)(a) of this section may
receive the scholarship while enrolled in a semester as a part-time student.
(2) The scholarship amount for the
semester in which a recipient is enrolled as a part-time student under
subdivision (d)(1)(A)(iv)(c)(1) of this section shall may be prorated by the
number of credit hours in which the recipient is enrolled.

SECTION 82. Arkansas Code § 6-85-212(d)(1)(C), concerning the
authorization for an applicant to elect for earned semester credit hours to
be only those earned after graduating from high school or obtaining a high
school equivalency diploma, is repealed.
(C)(i) An applicant may elect for the earned semester
credit hours under subdivision (d)(1)(A) of this section to be only those
semester credit hours earned after graduating from high school or obtaining a
high school equivalency diploma approved by the Adult Education Section.
(ii) If an applicant makes the election under
subdivision (d)(1)(C)(i) of this section, any semester credit hours earned
through concurrent credit or any other method before graduating high school
or obtaining a high school equivalency diploma approved by the Adult
Education Section shall not be counted as earned semester credit hours for
the purposes of determining a recipient's scholarship award amount under
subdivision (d)(1)(A) of this section.

SECTION 83. Arkansas Code § 6-85-212(d)(3), concerning scholarship
award amounts for certain institutions of higher education under the Arkansas
Challenge Scholarship Program, is amended to read as follows:
(3) Subject to the availability of net revenue, the scholarship
award for an academic year for a full-time student enrolled in one (1) of the
following institutions of higher education is one two thousand dollars
($1,000) ($2,000) for the first year and three thousand dollars ($3,000) for
the second year:
(A) A two-year approved institution of higher education;
107 03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(B) A branch campus of a four-year approved institution of
higher education; or
(C) An approved school of nursing.

SECTION 84. Arkansas Code § 6-85-302 is amended to read as follows:
6-85-302. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Academic year" means a measure of the academic work to be
accomplished by a student through the fall, spring, and summer semesters, or
the equivalent of the fall, spring, and summer semesters, in that order;
(2) “Approved institution of higher education” means an
institution of higher education approved by the Division of Higher Education
to participate in the Arkansas Workforce Challenge Scholarship Program and
that is:
(A) A state-supported two-year or four-year college or
university institution of higher education; or
(B) A private, nonprofit two-year or four-year college or
university with its primary headquarters located in Arkansas that is eligible
to receive Title IV federal student aid funds; or
(C) A public or private vocational-technical school that
is:
(i) Included on the Workforce Innovation and
Opportunity Act eligible training provider list;
(ii) Qualified to receive approval for veterans'
education benefits from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; or
(iii) Included on the State Board of Private Career
Education list; and
(2)(A)(3)(A) “Certificate program” means a program that is
offered or made available to a student by an approved institution of higher
education that leads to the obtainment of a certification or license,
including without limitation a program operated or sponsored by a third
party.
(B) "Certificate program" is determined by the division
and includes without limitation the following:
(i) Advanced manufacturing;
(ii) Health care;
108 03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(iii) Information technology;
(iv) Construction trades; or
(v) Logistics and distribution.
(C) The credit hours or contact hours awarded for a
certificate program may include credit hours or contact hours that are not
creditable toward an associate or a baccalaureate degree.

SECTION 85. Arkansas Code § 6-85-304(a), concerning student
eligibility under the Arkansas Workforce Challenge Scholarship Program, is
amended to read as follows:
(a) A student is eligible to receive an Arkansas Workforce Challenge
Scholarship for an academic year if the student applies to the Division of
Higher Education an approved institution of higher education by a date
determined by the Division of Higher Education preceding the academic year
and:
(1) Is an a legal Arkansas resident or, if the student is less
than twenty-one (21) years of age, either the student or one (1) parent of
the student is an a legal Arkansas resident;
(2) Meets either of the following requirements:
(A) Graduated from a:
(i) Public high school in Arkansas or another state;
(ii) Private high school in Arkansas or another
state; or
(iii) Home school under § 6-15-501 et seq. or
recognized by another state; or
(B) Received a high school equivalency diploma approved by
the Adult Education Section or another state;
(3) Is not receiving a scholarship under the Arkansas Academic
Challenge Scholarship Program, § 6-85-201 et seq.; and
(4) Is accepted for admission in a program of study at an
approved institution of higher education that leads to an associate degree or
a certificate program in one (1) of the following high-demand fields:
described in § 6-85-302.
(A) Industry;
(B) Health care; and
(C) Information technology; and
109 03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(5)(A) Whose program of study or certificate program will result
in the student's being qualified to work in an occupation identified by the
Division of Workforce Services under subdivision (a)(5)(B)(i) of this
section.
(B)(i) The Division of Workforce Services shall provide
annually to the Division of Higher Education by March 1 a list that
identifies the five (5) most in-demand occupations in this state in each
high-demand field under subdivision (a)(4) of this section that require the
completion of a program of study that leads to an associate degree or a
certificate program.
(ii) The Division of Workforce Services shall publish
on its website the list under subdivision (a)(5)(B)(i) of this section and
data supporting the list.

SECTION 86. Arkansas Code § 6-85-305 is amended to read as follows:
6-85-305. Distribution — Award amounts.
(a)(1) If funds are available, the Division of Higher Education shall
distribute Arkansas Workforce Challenge Scholarships to all students who meet
the requirements under § 6-85-304 6-85-302(2).
(2) Up to five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be allocated
for students eligible under § 6-85-302(2)(C).
(b)(1) The division shall distribute scholarships from the funds
available in an equal amount to every student eligible to receive a
scholarship under this subchapter.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the
The maximum scholarship award a student may receive in an academic year shall
be the lesser of: program costs or three thousand dollars ($3,000).
(A) Eight hundred dollars ($800); or
(B)(i) The cost of the certificate program or program of
study.
(ii) The cost of a certificate program or program of
study shall include:
(a) Tuition, fees, or other charges;
(b) Textbooks or other course materials; and
(c) Equipment needed for a course.
(3)(2) The scholarship awards may be used for expenses included
110 03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
in the cost of the certificate program or program of study.
(4)(3) A scholarship under this section shall be only for the
academic year for which it is awarded.
(4)(A) The division shall collaborate with the Office of Skills
Development to establish the criteria to be used to determine the eligibility
of students under § 6-85-302(1)(C), which shall be included in rules
promulgated by the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board.
(B) The office shall:
(i) Use the criteria established under subdivision
(b)(4)(A) of this section to determine the eligibility of students under § 6-
85-302(1)(C); and
(ii) Provide the necessary information regarding
eligible students to the division to enable the division to distribute
scholarship awards on behalf of an eligible student directly to the approved
institution of higher education.
(c)(1) If the division has funds remaining after making the
distributions under subsection (b) of this section, the division shall
distribute scholarships to students for the summer term of the academic year.
(2) If funds are available under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section, a student shall apply for a scholarship for a summer term by a date
determined by the division preceding the summer term.
(3)(A) The division shall distribute scholarships for a summer
term in the same manner as under subsection (b) of this section.
(B) Scholarships for a summer term may be used in the same
manner as under subsection (b) of this section.
(4) A student who received a scholarship under subsection (b) of
this section may also receive a scholarship for a summer term.
(d)(c) The division shall disburse all scholarship awards on behalf of
an eligible student directly to the approved institution of higher education.

SECTION 87. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 85, Subchapter 3, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-85-308. Reporting requirements.
(a) An approved institution of higher education accepting funds under
this subchapter shall submit an annual report to the Division of Higher
Education that includes without limitation the following:
111 03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(1) Individual student program completer information as defined
by the division; and
(2) Student information required to be provided to the division
under § 6-85-216.
(b) An approved institution of higher education accepting funds under
this subchapter shall submit an annual report to the Office of Skills
Development that includes without limitation the following:
(1) Individual student program completer information as defined
by the division; and
(2) Student information required to be provided to the division
under § 6-85-216.

SECTION 88. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 85, Subchapter 4 is
repealed.
Subchapter 4 — Arkansas Concurrent Challenge Scholarship Program

6-85-401. Creation.
There is created the Arkansas Concurrent Challenge Scholarship Program.

6-85-402. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Approved institution of higher education” means an
institution of higher education that:
(A) Is approved by the Division of Higher Education to
participate in the Arkansas Concurrent Challenge Scholarship Program;
(B) Offers at least a fifty-percent discount on the
tuition and mandatory fees of an endorsed concurrent enrollment course or
certificate program to a student who is enrolled in an endorsed concurrent
enrollment course or certificate program, unless other opportunities are
provided that lower the tuition and mandatory fees below fifty percent (50%);
and
(C) Is a:
(i) State-supported two-year or four-year college or
university; or
(ii) Private, nonprofit two-year or four-year college
or university that has its primary headquarters located in Arkansas and that
112 03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
is eligible to receive Title IV federal student aid funds;
(2)(A) “Certificate program” means a program that is offered or
made available to a student by an approved institution of higher education
that leads to the obtainment of a certification or license.
(B) “Certificate program” does not include a program that
is operated or sponsored by a third party;
(3)(A) “Endorsed concurrent enrollment course” means the same as
defined in § 6-16-1202.
(B) “Endorsed concurrent enrollment course” does not
include a program that is operated or sponsored by a third party; and
(4) “Student” means a person in grade ten (10), grade eleven
(11), or grade twelve (12) who is enrolled at a:
(A) Public high school in Arkansas;
(B) Private high school in Arkansas; or
(C) Home school, as defined in § 6-15-501.

6-85-403. Eligibility.
(a) A student is eligible to receive an Arkansas Concurrent Challenge
Scholarship under this subchapter for an academic semester or academic year
during which the student is enrolled in an endorsed concurrent enrollment
course or certificate program if the student:
(1) Is an Arkansas resident or, if the student is less than
twenty-one (21) years of age, either the student or one (1) parent of the
student is an Arkansas resident; and
(2)(A) Submits a student success plan as described under § 6-15-
2911(b).
(B) The student success plan required under subdivision
(a)(2)(A) of this section for a student who is enrolled in an endorsed
concurrent enrollment course or certificate program shall:
(i) Be prepared in consultation with:
(a) School personnel, the student, and the
student's parent or legal guardian; or
(b) A college advisor; and
(ii) Include:
(a) An endorsed concurrent enrollment course
or certificate program that is relevant to the student's success plan; and
113 03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(b) Measures that ensure the successful
completion of the endorsed concurrent enrollment course or certificate
program in which the student is enrolled.
(b)(1) A student successfully completes an endorsed concurrent
enrollment course or a course taken towards the completion of a certificate
program under this subchapter if he or she completes the course or program
and receives a minimum grade point average of 2.5.
(2)(A) A student who fails to successfully complete an endorsed
concurrent enrollment course or a course taken towards the completion of a
certificate program under this subchapter shall:
(i) Retain eligibility for a scholarship under this
subchapter; and
(ii) Enroll in no more than one (1) endorsed
concurrent enrollment course or course required for the completion of a
certificate program for the first semester following the semester in which
the student failed to successfully complete an endorsed concurrent enrollment
course or course taken towards the completion of a certificate program.
(B) However, if a student fails an endorsed concurrent
enrollment course or a course taken towards the completion of a certificate
program under this subchapter a second time, the student shall be ineligible
to reapply for a scholarship under this subchapter.
(c) A student whose enrollment in a vocational center is reimbursable
under § 6-51-305 is not eligible for a scholarship under this subchapter.

6-85-404. Funding.
(a) For an academic year, Arkansas Concurrent Challenge Scholarships
under this subchapter shall be funded with any funds remaining after the
Division of Higher Education allocates sufficient funding to award Arkansas
Workforce Challenge Scholarships under § 6-85-301 et seq., at a level
equivalent to the awards made in the previous academic year.
(b)(1) A scholarship under this subchapter shall not be awarded for an
academic year if:
(A) Less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($250,000) is available under subsection (a) of this section; or
(B) The division received a loan from the Scholarship
Shortfall Reserve Trust Account under § 23-115-802 for the Arkansas Academic
114 03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
Challenge Scholarship Program, § 6-85-201 et seq., for the previous academic
year.
(2) Any funds under subsection (a) of this section that are not
disbursed for scholarships under this subchapter shall be carried over to the
next academic year to be used for scholarships under this subchapter.

6-85-405. Distribution — Award amounts.
(a) If funds are available, the Division of Higher Education shall
award Arkansas Concurrent Challenge Scholarships to all students who meet the
requirements under this subchapter.
(b)(1) The division shall distribute scholarships from the funds
available in an equal amount to every approved institution of higher
education that has enrolled a student eligible to receive a scholarship under
this subchapter.
(2) The maximum scholarship award a student may receive in an
academic year shall be the lesser of:
(A)(i) Five hundred dollars ($500).
(ii) A scholarship awarded to a student who is
eligible under § 6-85-403 shall be awarded in the amount of one hundred
twenty-five dollars ($125) for each endorsed concurrent enrollment credit
course or certificate program in which the eligible student is enrolled, up
to two (2) endorsed concurrent enrollment credit courses or certificate
programs per semester; or
(B) The tuition and mandatory fees of the endorsed
concurrent credit course or certificate program.
(3) A scholarship granted under this section may be awarded in
addition to any funds received for the enrollment in an endorsed concurrent
enrollment course under § 6-16-1204(e)(3).
(4) Unless a student's high school or community-based program
provides financial assistance for the cost of tuition and mandatory fees for
an endorsed concurrent enrollment course or certificate program, the
remaining cost of tuition and mandatory fees for an endorsed concurrent
enrollment course or certificate program is the responsibility of the
eligible student who is enrolled in the endorsed concurrent enrollment course
or certificate program.

115 03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
6-85-406. Rules.
The Division of Higher Education shall promulgate rules to implement
this subchapter.

SECTION 89. Arkansas Code § 6-85-502(b)(5), concerning the amount of
net proceeds to fund scholarships under the Arkansas Concurrent Challenge
Scholarship Program used for the lottery fiscal impact statement, is amended
to read as follows:
(5) The amount of net proceeds that was necessary to fund scholarships
under the Arkansas Concurrent Challenge Scholarship Program, § 6-85-401
ACCESS to Acceleration Scholarship Program, § 6-85-701 et seq., during each
of the last four (4) years immediately preceding the year in which the
proposed bill is being considered, listed separately;

SECTION 90. Arkansas Code § 6-85-502(b)(7)(C), concerning the
comparison of the year with the highest amount of net proceeds necessary to
fund scholarships under the Arkansas Concurrent Challenge Scholarship
Program, is amended to read as follows:
(C) The year with the highest amount of net proceeds
necessary to fund scholarships under the Arkansas Concurrent Challenge
Scholarship Program, § 6-85-401 ACCESS to Acceleration Scholarship Program, §
6-85-701 et seq., as determined under subdivision (b)(5) of this section; and

SECTION 91. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 85, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter — 7 ACCESS to Acceleration Scholarship Program

6-85-701 Creation.
There is created the ACCESS to Acceleration Scholarship Program.

6-85-702. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Approved institution of higher education” means an
institution of higher education that:
(A) Is approved by the Division of Higher Education to
participate in the ACCESS to Acceleration Scholarship Program; and
116 03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
(B) Is a:
(i) State-supported two-year or four-year
institution of higher education; or
(ii) Private, nonprofit two-year or four-year
institution of higher education that has its primary headquarters located in
Arkansas and is eligible to receive Title IV federal student aid funds;
(2)(A) “Certificate program” means a program that is offered or
made available to a student by an approved institution of higher education
that leads to the obtainment of a certification or license.
(B) “Certificate program” does not include a program that
is operated or sponsored by a third party;
(3)(A) “Concurrent credit course” means a course as defined in
§ 6-16-1202.
(B) “Concurrent credit course” does not include a program
that is operated or sponsored by a third party; and
(4) “Eligible student” means a student enrolled in grade ten
(10), grade eleven (11), or grade twelve (12) at a public high school in
Arkansas.

6-85-703. Eligibility.
(a) A student is eligible to be awarded a scholarship under this
subchapter for an academic semester or academic year during which the student
is enrolled in a concurrent credit course if the student is eligible to
enroll in the concurrent credit course under § 6-16-1204(a)(5).
(b) Scholarship funds shall not be used for courses at a vocational
center that are reimbursable under § 6-51-305.
(c) A student is not eligible for a scholarship under this subchapter
if the student is enrolled in a concurrent credit course that may be funded
under § 6-18-2506.

6-85-704. Funding.
(a) For an academic year, the following shall be used to fund
scholarships under this subchapter:
(1) Excess funding returned to the Office of the Arkansas
Lottery under § 6-85-212(d)(2)(B)(i) from the previous academic year; and
(2) Net proceeds remaining from the previous academic year after
117 03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
the office transfers the funds requested by the Division of Higher Education
under § 23-115-801(c)(2).
(b)(1) A scholarship under this subchapter shall not be awarded for an
academic year if:
(A) Less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($250,000) is available under subsection (a) of this section; or
(B) The division received a loan from the Scholarship
Shortfall Reserve Trust Account under § 23-115-802 for the Arkansas Academic
Challenge Scholarship Program, § 6-85-201 et seq., for the previous academic
year.
(2) Any funds under subsection (a) of this section that are not
disbursed for scholarships under this subchapter shall be carried over to the
next academic year to be used for scholarships under this subchapter.

6-85-705. Distribution — Award Amounts.
(a) If funds are available, the Division of Higher Education shall
award an ACCESS to Acceleration Scholarship to all eligible students who meet
the requirements under this subchapter.
(b)(1) The division shall distribute scholarships from the funds
available in an equal amount to every approved institution of higher
education that has enrolled a student eligible to receive a scholarship under
this subchapter.
(2) A scholarship awarded to a student who is eligible under §
6-85-703 shall be awarded in the amount of sixty-five dollars ($65) per
concurrent credit course hour in which the eligible student is enrolled, for
a maximum of fifteen (15) concurrent credit course hours per semester.
(3) The maximum scholarship amount a student may be awarded in
an academic year, including summer semesters, shall not exceed two thousand
dollars ($2,000).
(c)(1) A state-supported two-year or four-year institution of higher
education may offer a reduced tuition rate for concurrent credit courses
offered by the state-supported institution of higher education to eligible
students under this subchapter.
(2) The reduction in tuition under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section shall not be considered an institutional scholarship.

118 03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
6-85-706. Rules.
The Division of Higher Education may promulgate rules to implement this
subchapter.

SECTION 92. Arkansas Code § 20-7-133(b)(2), concerning members
appointed by the Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education to the
Child Health Advisory Committee, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
appoint:
(A) One (1) member to represent the Division of Elementary
and Secondary Education;
(B) One (1) member to represent the Arkansas School
Nutrition Association Child Nutrition Unit;
(C) One (1) member to represent the Arkansas School Nurses
Association public school nurse;
(D) One (1) member to represent the Arkansas Association
of Educational Administrators public school administrator;
(E) One (1) member to represent the Arkansas PTA of a
public school district parent-teacher association;
(F) One (1) member to represent the Arkansas School Boards
Association of a public school district board of directors;
(G) One (1) member to represent the Arkansas Association
of School Business Officials public school district finance employee; and
(H) One (1) member to represent the Arkansas Association
for Supervision and Curriculum Development Two (2) public school licensed
educators; and
(I) One (1) member who is a classroom teacher.

SECTION 93. Arkansas Code § 21-5-703(c), concerning the award of
scholarship benefits by the Arkansas State Claims Commssion during the claims
process for death benefits of public employees, is amended to read as
follows:
(c) Unless § 6-82-504(e) § 6-82-2505(e) is applicable, the commission
shall award any scholarship benefit provided by the provisions of § 6-82-501
et seq. the Arkansas Heroes Scholarship Act, § 6-82-2501 et seq., at the same
time any death benefit or total and permanent disability benefit is awarded
119 03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
under this subchapter.

SECTION 94. Arkansas Code § 21-5-705(a)(3)(B)(i), concerning the
maximum death benefit paid to a designated beneficiary or survivor of certain
public employees killed in the line of duty, is amended to read as follows:
(i) A maximum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars
($150,000) per individual death, including educational benefits provided in §
6-82-501 et seq. the Arkansas Heroes Scholarship Act, § 6-82-2501 et seq.;
and

SECTION 95. The introductory language of Arkansas Code § 23-115-
801(b)(1)(B)(i), concerning the establishment of the Lottery Scholarship
Trust Account by the Office of the Arkansas Lottery, is amended to read as
follows:
(B)(i) The office shall establish the Lottery Scholarship
Trust Account as required under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section to fund
the Arkansas Academic Challenge Scholarship Program, § 6-85-201 et seq., the
Arkansas Workforce Challenge Scholarship Program, § 6-85-301 et seq., the
Arkansas Concurrent Challenge Scholarship Program, § 6-85-401 ACCESS to
Acceleration Scholarship Program, § 6-85-701 et seq., and any other
scholarship funded with net proceeds from the state lottery in a financial
institution into which the office shall transfer:

SECTION 96. Arkansas Code § 23-115-801(b)(1)(B)(ii) and (iii),
concerning funding of the Lottery Scholarship Trust Account by the Office of
the Arkansas Lottery, are amended to read as follows:
(ii) The funds transferred by the office into the
Lottery Scholarship Trust Account for the Arkansas Academic Challenge
Scholarship Program, § 6-85-201 et seq., the Arkansas Workforce Challenge
Scholarship Program, § 6-85-301 et seq., the Arkansas Concurrent Challenge
Scholarship Program, § 6-85-401 ACCESS to Acceleration Scholarship Program, §
6-85-701 et seq., and any other scholarship funded with net proceeds from the
state lottery as established under subdivision (b)(1)(B)(i) of this section
shall be used for:
(a) Arkansas Workforce Challenge Scholarships;
(b) Any management fees charged by the
120 03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
financial institution to manage the trust account for scholarship award
supplements;
(c) Arkansas Concurrent Challenge Scholarships
ACCESS to Acceleration Scholarships;
(d) Arkansas Academic Challenge Scholarships;
and
(e) Any other scholarship funded with net
proceeds from the state lottery.
(iii) Annually, the office shall transfer to the
division the funds from the previous academic year, if any, that were
transferred by the office into the Lottery Scholarship Trust Account
established under subdivision (b)(1)(B)(i) of this section for distribution
of Arkansas Academic Challenge Scholarships, Arkansas Workforce Challenge
Scholarships, Arkansas Concurrent Challenge ACCESS to Acceleration
Scholarships, and any other scholarship funded with net proceeds from the
state lottery.

SECTION 97. Arkansas Code § 23-115-801(c)(1)(C), concerning the
scholarship programs that the Commissioner of the Division of Higher
Education is required to certify funding for, is amended to read as follows:
(C) The Arkansas Concurrent Challenge Scholarship Program,
§ 6-85-401 et seq.; ACCESS to Acceleration Scholarship Program, § 6-85-701 et
seq.; and

SECTION 98. Arkansas Code § 23-115-801(c)(2)(D)(ii)(a), concerning the
distribution to recipients if funds remain after award of all scholarships
under the Arkansas Academic Challenge Program, is amended to read as follows:
(ii)(a) If available funds remain after the award of
all scholarships under the Arkansas Academic Challenge Program, § 6-85-201 et
seq., then the available funds shall be distributed to recipients of
scholarships under the Arkansas Workforce Challenge Scholarship Program, § 6-
85-301 et seq., and the Arkansas Concurrent Challenge Scholarship Program, §
6-85-401 ACCESS to Acceleration Scholarship Program, § 6-85-701 et seq., on a
pro rata basis as determined by the division.

SECTION 99. Arkansas Code § 23-115-802(c)(2) and (3), concerning the
121 03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
process of using the Scholarship Shortfall Reserve Trust Account if net
proceeds are insufficient to meet scholarship funding, are amended to read as
follows:
(2) Except as provided in subdivision (c)(3)(B) of this section,
the Scholarship Shortfall Reserve Trust Account shall not be drawn upon to
fund Arkansas Workforce Challenge Scholarships under the Arkansas Workforce
Challenge Scholarship Program, § 6-85-301 et seq., Arkansas Concurrent
Challenge Scholarships under the Arkansas Concurrent Challenge Scholarship
Program, § 6-85-401 ACCESS to Acceleration Scholarship Program, § 6-85-701 et
seq., or any other scholarship funded with net proceeds from the state
lottery.
(3)(A) Determining the maximum amount of loans from the
Scholarship Shortfall Reserve Trust Account to the Arkansas Academic
Challenge Scholarship Program, § 6-85-201 et seq., the Arkansas Workforce
Challenge Scholarship Program, § 6-85-301 et seq., or the Arkansas Concurrent
Challenge Scholarship Program, § 6-85-401 ACCESS to Acceleration Scholarship
Program, § 6-85-701 et seq., is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This
is usually accomplished by the General Assembly's delineating such funding
allocations for the various scholarship programs, with the approval of the
Administrative Rules Subcommittee of the Legislative Council and through
oversight as required by law by the Lottery Oversight Subcommittee of the
Legislative Council. Further, the General Assembly determines that the
Division of Higher Education may operate more efficiently with some
flexibility, therefore it is both necessary and appropriate that the General
Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative
Council or the Joint Budget Committee as provided by this section.
(B) If the division determines it is necessary to borrow
from the Scholarship Shortfall Reserve Trust Account to fund scholarships
under the Arkansas Academic Challenge Scholarship Program, § 6-85-201 et
seq., the Arkansas Workforce Challenge Scholarship Program, § 6-85-301 et
seq., or the Arkansas Concurrent Challenge Scholarship Program, § 6-85-401 et
seq., ACCESS to Acceleration Scholarship Program, § 6-85-701 et seq., the
division shall first obtain review and approval from the Legislative Council
or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

SECTION 100. DO NOT CODIFY. SEVERABILITY CLAUSE. If any provision of
122 03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/12/25 HB1512
this act or the application of this act to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of
this act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end, the provisions of this act are declared
severable.


/s/M. Shepherd




























123 03-12-2025 10:50:08 CRH113